Gabardine
Gábardine. n.s. [gavardina, Italian.] A coarse frock; any mean dress.
My best way is to creep under his gabardine; there is no other shelter hereabout. Shakespeare's Tempest.
You call me misbeliever, cut-throat dog,And spit upon my Jewish gabardine. Shakes. Mer. of Venice.
The knight did straight submit,And laid his weapons at her feet:Next he disrob'd his gabardine,And with it did himself resign. Hudibras, b. i.

Gabble (noun)
Gábble. n.s. [from the verb.]

 Inarticulate noise like that of brute animals.
Not to know what we speak one to another, so we seem to know, is to know straight our purpose: chough's language, gabble enough, and good enough. Shak. All's well that ends well.
 Loud talk without meaning.
Forthwith a hideous gabble rises loudAmong the builders; each to other calls,Not understood. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. xii.

Gabble (verb)
To Gábble. v.n. [gabbare, Italian; gabberen, Dutch.]

 To make an inarticulate noise.
        When thou could'st not, savage,Shew thine own meaning, but would'st gabble likeA thing most brutish, I endow'd thy purposesWith words that made them known. Shakesp. Tempest.
Flocks of fowl, that when the tempests roar,With their hoarse gabbling seek the silent shoar. Dryd. Æn.
 To prate loudly without meaning.
Have you no wit, manners, nor honesty, but to gabble like tinkers at this time of night? Do ye make an alehouse of my lady's house? Shakespeare's Twelfth Night.
Which made some think, when he did gabble,Th' had heard three labourers of Babel. Hudibras, p. i.
Such a rout, and such a rabble,Run to hear Jack Pudding gabble. Swift.

Gabbler
Gábbler. n.s. [from gabble.] A prater; a chattering fellow.

Gabel
Gábel. n.s. [gabelle, French; gabello, Italian; ʒafel, Saxon, a tribute.] An excise; a tax.
The gabels of Naples are very high on oil, wine, and tobacco. Addison's Remarks on Italy.

Gabion
Gábion. n.s. [French.] A wicker basket which is filled with earth to make a fortification or intrenchment.
His battery was defended all along with gabions, and casks filled with sand. Knolles's History of the Turks.

Gable
Gáble. n.s. [gaval, Welsh; gable, French.] The sloping roof of a building.
Take care that all your brick-work be covered with the tiling, according to the new way of building, without gable ends, which are very heavy, and very apt to let the water into the brick-work. Mortimer's Husbandry.

Gad (noun)
Gad. n.s. [ʒad, Saxon; gaddur, Islandick, a club.]

 A wedge or ingot of steel.
Flemish steel is brought down the Rhine to Dort, and other parts of Holland and Flanders, some in bars, and some in gads; and therefore called Flemish steel, and sometimes gad steel. Moxon's Mech. Exer.
 It seems to be used by Shakespeare for a stile or graver, [from ʒad, Saxon, a goad.]
            I will go get a leaf of brass,And with a gad of steel will write these words. Shakespeare.

Gad (verb)
To Gad. v.n. [Derived by Skinner from gadfly; by Junius from gadaw, Welsh, to forsake.] To ramble about without any settled purpose; to rove loosely and idly.
How now, my headstrong, where have you been gadding?— Where I have learnt me to repent. Shakes. Rom. and Jul.
Give the water no passage, neither a wicked woman liberty to gad abroad. Ecclus. xxv. 25.
The lesser devils arose with ghastly rore,And thronged forth about the world to gad;Each land they fill'd, river, stream and shore. Fairfax, b. iv.
Envy is a gadding passion, and walketh the streets, and doth not keep home. Bacon, Essay 9.
Gad not abroad at ev'ry quest and callOf an untrained hope or passion;To court each place or fortune that doth fall,Is wantonness in contemplation. Herbert.
Thee, shepherd, thee the woods and desart caves,With wild thyme and the gadding vine o'ergrown,And all their echo's moan. Milton.
A fierce loud buzzing breeze; their stings draw blood,And drive the cattle gadding through the wood. Dryd. Virg.
She wreaks her anger on her rival's head;With furies frights her from her native home,And drives her gadding, round the world to roam. Dryden.
            Gull 'em with freedom,And you shall see 'em toss their tails, and gadAs if the breeze had stung them. Dryd. and Lee's Oedipus.
There's an ox lost, and this coxcomb runs a gadding after wild fowl. L'Estrange.
No wonder their thoughts should be perpetually shifting from what disgusts them, and seek better entertainment in more pleasing objects, after which they will unavoidably be gadding. Locke.

Gadder
Gádder. n.s. [from gad.] A rambler; one that runs much abroad without business.
A drunken woman, and a gadder abroad, causeth great anger, and she will not cover her own shame. Ecclus. xxvi. 8.

Gaddingly
Gáddingly. adv. [from gad.] In a rambling, roving manner.

Gadfly
Gádfly. n.s. [gad and fly; but by Skinner, who makes it the original of gad, goadfly. Supposed to be originally from goad, in Saxon ʒad, and fly.] A fly that when he stings the cattle make them gad or run madly about; the breese.
The fly called the gadfly breedeth of somewhat that swimeth upon the top of the water, and is most about ponds. Bac.
Light fly his slumbers, if perchance a flightOf angry gadflies fasten on the herd. Thomson's Summer.

Gaff
Gaff. n.s. A harpoon or large hook. Ainsworth.

Gaffer
Gáffer. n.s. [ʒefere, companion, Saxon.] A word of respect now obsolete, or applied only in contempt to a mean person.
For gaffer Treadwell told us by the bye,Excessive sorrow is exceeding dry. Gay's Pastorals.

Gaffles
Gáffles. n.s. [ʒafelucas, spears, Saxon.]

 Artificial spurs put upon cocks when they are set to fight.

 A steel contrivance to bend cross-bows. Ainsworth.

Gag (noun)
Gag. n.s. [from the verb.] Something put into the mouth to hinder speech or eating.
Some, when the kids their dams too deeply drain,With gags and muzzles their soft mouths restrain. Dryden.
Your woman would have run up stairs before me; but I have secured her below with a gag in her chaps. Dryden.

Gag (verb)
To Gag. v.n. [from gaghel, Dutch, the palate, Minshew.] To stop the mouth with something that may allow to breathe, but hinder to speak.
He's out of his guard already: unless you laugh and minister occasion to him, he is gagg'd. Shakesp. Twelfth Night.
There foam'd rebellious logick, gagg'd and bound. Pope.

Gage (noun)
Gage. n.s. [gage, French.] A pledge; a pawn; a caution; any thing given in security.
Who, when the shamed shield of slain SansfoyHe spy'd, with that same fairy champion's page,He to him leapt; and that same envious gage,Of victor's glory, from him snatcht away. Fairy Queen.
            There I throw my gageDisclaiming here the kindred of a king,And lay aside my high blood's royalty. Shakesp. Richard II.
There is my gage, the manual seal of death,That marks thee out for hell. Shakesp. Richard II.
They from their mothers breasts poor orphans rend,Nor without gages to the needy lend. Sandys's Paraphrase.
I am made the cautionary pledge,The gage and hostage of your keeping it. Southern's Oroonok.
But since it was decreed, auspicious king,In Britain's right that thou should'st wed the main,Heav'n, as a gage, would cast some previous thing,And therefore doom'd that Lawson should be slain. Dryden.
In any truth, that gets not possession of our minds by self-evidence or demonstration, the arguments, that gain it assent, are the vouchers and gage of its probability. Locke.

Gage (verb)
To Gage. v.a. [gager, French.]

 To wager; to depone as a wager; to impawn; to give as a caution, pledge, or security.
Against the which, a moiety competentWas gaged by our king. Shakespeare's Hamlet.
Drawing near the shore, he found the Turkish merchants making merry upon the main: unto these merchants he gave due salutations, gaging his faith for their safety, and they likewise to him. Knolles's History of the Turks.
 To measure; to take the contents of any vessel of liquids particularly.  More properly gauge. See GAUGE.
        We shall see your bearing.— Nay, but I bar to-night: you shall not gage meBy what we do to-night. Shakesp. Merchant of Venice.

Gaggle
To Gággle. v.n. [gagen, gagelen, Dutch.] To make noise like a goose.
Birds prune their feathers, geese gaggle, and crows seem to call upon rain; which is but the comfort they receive in the relenting of the air. Bacon's Natural History, № 823.
May fat geese gaggle with melodious voice,And ne'er want gooseberries or apple-sauce. King.

Gaiety
Gaíety. See Gayety.

Gaily
Gaily. adv. [from gay.]

 Airily; cheerfully.

 Splendidly; pompously; with great show.
The ladies gaily dress'd, the Mall adornWith curious dyes, and paint the sunny morn. Gay's Trivia.
Like some fair flow'r that early Spring supplies,That gaily blooms, but ev'n in blooming dies. Pope.

Gain (adjective)
Gain. adj. [An old word now out of use.] Handy; ready; dexterous.

Gain (noun)
Gain. n.s. [gain, French.]

 Profit; advantage.
But what things were gain to me, those I counted loss for Christ. Phil. iii. 7.
Besides the purpose it were now, to teach how victory should be used, or the gains thereof communicated to the general content. Raleigh's Essays.
It is in praise of men as in gettings and gains; for light gains make heavy purses; for light gains come thick, whereas great come but now and then. Bacon, Essay 53.
This must be made by some governor upon his own private account, who has a great stock that he is content to turn that way, and is invited by the gains. Temple.
 Interest; lucrative views.
That sir, which serves for gain,And follows but for form,Will pack, when it begins to rain,And leave thee in the storm. Shakespeare's King Lear.
 Unlawful advantage.
Did I make a gain of you by any of them whom I sent unto you? 2 Cor. xii. 17.
 Overplus in a comparative computation; any thing opposed to loss.

Gain (verb active)
To Gain. v.a. [gagner, French.]

 To obtain as profit or advantage.
Thou hast taken usury and increase, and thou hast greedily gained of thy neighbours by extortions. Ezek. xxii. 12.
 To have the overplus in comparative computation.
If you have two vessels to fill, and you empty one to fill the other, you gain nothing by that. Burnet's Theory of the Earth.
 To obtain; to procure.
If such a tradition were endeavoured to be set on foot, it is not easy to imagine how it should at first gain entertainment; but much more difficult to conceive how ever it should come to be universally propagated. Tillotson's Sermons.
 To obtain increase of any thing allotted.
I know that ye would gain the time, because ye see the king is gone from me. Dan. ii. 8.
 To obtain whatever good or bad.
Ye should not have loosed from Crete, and have gained this harm and loss. Acts xxvii. 21.
They who were sent to the other pass, after a short resistance, gained it. Clarendon, b. viii.
Fat fees from the defended Umbrian draws,And only gains the wealthy client's cause. Dryd. Pers. Sat.
O love! for Sylvia let me gain the prize,And make my tongue victorious as her eyes. Pope's Spring.
 To win.
 They who were sent to the other pass, after a short resistance, gained it. Clarendon, b. viii.
 Fat fees from the defended Umbrian draws, And only gains the wealthy client's cause. Dryd. Pers. Sat.
 O love! for Sylvia let me gain the prize, And make my tongue victorious as her eyes. Pope's Spring.
 To draw into any interest or party.
Come, with presents, laden from the port,To gratify the queen and gain the court. Dryd. Virg. &AElig.n.
    If Pyrrhus must be wrought to pity,No woman does it better than yourself:If you gain him, I shall comply of course. A. Phillips.
 To reach; to attain.
The West glimmers with some streaks of day:Now spurs the lated traveller apace,To gain the timely inn. Shakespeare's Macbeth.
Death was the post, which I almost did gain:Shall I once more be tost into the main? Waller.
We came to the roots of the mountain, and had a very troublesome march to gain the top of it. Addison on Italy.
Thus sav'd from death, they gain the Phestan shores,With shatter'd vessels and disabled oars. Pope's Odyssey, b. iii.
 To Gain over. To draw to another party or interest.
The court of Hanover should have endeavoured to gain over those who were represented as their enemies. Swift.

Gain (verb neuter 1)
To Gain. v.n.

 To encroach; to come forward by degrees.
When watchful herons leave their wat'ry stand,And mounting upward with erected flight,Gain on the skies, and soar above the sight. Dryd. Virg. Geo.
On the land while here the ocean gains,In other parts it leaves wide sandy plains. Pope on Criticism.
 To get ground; to prevail against.
The English have not only gained upon the Venetians in the Levant, but have their cloth in Venice itself. Addison.
 To obtain influence with.
My good behaviour had gained so far on the emperor, that I began to conceive hopes of liberty. Gulliver's Travels.

Gain (verb neuter 2)
To Gain. v.n. To grow rich; to have advantage; to be advanced in interest or happiness.

Gainer
Gáiner. n.s. [from gain.] One who receives profit or advantage.
The client, besides retaining a good conscience, is always a gainer, and by no means can be at any loss, as seeing, if the composition be overhard, he may relieve himself by recourse to his oath. Bacon's off. of Alienation.
            If what I get in empireI lose in fame, I think myself no gainer. Denham's Sophy.
He that loses any thing, and gets wisdom by it, is a gainer by the loss. L'Estrange, Fable 59.
By extending a well regulated trade, we are as great gainers by the commodities of many other countries as those of our own nation. Addison's Freeholder.

Gainful
Gaínful. adj. [gain and full.]

 Advantageous; profitable.
He will dazzle his eyes, and bait him in with the luscious proposal of some gainful purchase, some rich match, or advantageous project. South.
 Lucrative; productive of money.
Nor knows he merchants gainful care. Dryden's Horace.
                        Maro's muse,Thrice sacred muse! commodious precepts gives,Instructive to the swains, not wholly bentOn what is gainful: sometimes she divertsFrom solid counsels. Phillips.

Gainfully
Gáinfully. adv. [from gainful.] Profitably; advantageously.

Gainfulness
Gáinfulness. n.s. [from gainful.] Profit; advantage.

Galaxy
Gala'xy. n.s. [γαλαξία; galaxie, Fr.] The milky way; a stream of light in the sky.
 A broad and ample road, whose dust is gold, And pavement stars, as stars to thee appear, Seen in the galaxy. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. vii.
 A brown, for which heaven would disband The galaxy, and stars be tann'd. Cleaveland.
 Men doubt, because they stand so thick i' th' sky, If those be stars that pain the galaxy. Cowley.
 We dare not undertake to shew what advantage is brought to us by those innumerable stars in the galaxy. Bentley's Serm.

Gall (noun)
Gall. n.s. [ʒeala, Saxon; galle, Dutch.]

 The bile; an animal juice remarkable for its supposed bitterness.
        Come to my woman's breast,And take my milk for gall, you murth'ring ministers! Shak.
A honey tongue, a heart of gall,Is fancy's spring, but sorrow's fall. Shakespeare.
    It drew from my heart all love,And added to the gall. Shakespeare's King Lear.
This position informs us of a vulgar errour, terming the gall bitter, as their proverb more peremptorily implies, It's as bitter as gall; whereas there's nothing gustable sweeter; and what is most unctuous must needs partake of a sweet savour. Harvey on Consumptions.
Gall is the greatest resolvent of curdled milk: Boerhaave has given at a time one drop of the gall of an eel with success. Arbuthnot on Diet.
 The part which contains the bile.
The married couple, as a testimony of future concord, did cast the gall of the sacrifice behind the altar. Brown's Vu. Err.
 Any thing extremely bitter.
        Thither write, my queen,And with mine eyes I'll drink the words you send,Though ink he made of gall. Shakespeare's Cymbeline.
          Poison be their drink!Gall, worse than gall, the daintiest meat they taste! Shakes.
She still insults, and you must still adore;Grant that the honey's much, the gall is more. Dryd. Juv.
 Rancour; malignity.
They did great hurt unto his title, and have left a perpetual gall in the mind of the people. Spenser's State of Ireland.
 A slight hurt by fretting off the skin. [From the verb.]
This is the fatalest wound of the tongue, carries least smart, but infinitely more of danger; and is as much superior to the former, as a gangrene is to a gall or scratch: this may be sore and vexing, but that stupifying and deadening. Government of the Tongue, s. 8.
 Anger; bitterness of mind.
Suppose your hero were a lover,Though he before had gall and rage;He grows dispirited and low,He hates the fight, and shuns the blow. Prior.
 [From galla.]
Galls or galnuts are a kind of preternatural and accidental tumours, produced on various trees; but those of the oak only are used in medicine.  We have two kinds, the Oriental and the European galls: the Oriental are brought from Aleppo, of the bigness of a large nutmeg, with tubercles on their surface, of a very firm and solid texture, and a disagreeable, acerb, and astringent taste.  The European galls are of the same size, with perfectly smooth surfaces: they are light, often spongy, and cavernous within, and always of a lax texture.  They have a less austere taste, and are of much less value than the first sort, both in manufactures and medicine.  The general history of galls is this: an insect of the fly kind, for the safety of her young, wounds the branches of the trees, and in the hole deposites her egg: the lacerated vessels of the tree discharging their contents, form a tumour or woody case about the hole, where the egg is thus defended from all injuries.  This tumour also serves for the food of the tender maggot, produced from the egg of the fly, which, as soon as it is perfect, and in its winged state, gnaws its way out, as appears from the hole found in the gall; and where no hole is seen on its surface, the maggot, or its remains, are sure to be found within, on breaking it.  It has been observed, that the oak does not produce galls in cold countries: but this observation should be confined to the medicinal galls; for all those excrescencies which we find on this tree in our own woods, and call oak-apples, oak-grapes, and oak-cones, are true and genuine galls, though less firm in their texture.  The true reason of the hard ones not being produced with us, seems to be that we want the peculiar species of insect to which they owe their origin, which is a fly of the ichneumon kind, only found in hot countries.  The species of fly that occasions, by its punctures, the soft galls of France and Italy, is different both from the Syrian one and from ours, though still of the ichneumon kind; and we find the several kinds, which occasion the different galls in our own kingdom, produce different kinds, and those of different degrees of hardness, on the same tree.  Galls are used in making ink, and in dying and dressing leather, and many other manufactures.  In medicine they are very astringent, and good under proper management. Hill.
Besides the acorns, the oak beareth galls, oak-apples, and oak-nuts. Bacon's Natural History, № 635.
Malpighi, in his treatise of galls, under which name he comprehends all preternatural and morbose excrescences, demonstrates that all such excrescences, where any insects are found, are excited by some venenose liquor, which, together with their eggs, such insects shed. Ray on the Creation.
The Aleppo galls, wherewith we make ink, are no other than cases of insects, which are bred in them. Derham.

Gall (verb active)
To Gall. v.a. [galer, French.]

 To hurt by fretting the skin.
            I'll touch my pointWith this contagion, that, if I gall him slightly,It may be death. Shakespeare's Hamlet.
His yoke is easy, when by us embrac'd;But loads and galls, if on our necks 'tis cast. Denham.
A carrier, when he would think of a remedy for his galled horse, begins with casting his eye upon all things. Locke.
    On the monarch's speech Achilles broke,And furious thus, and interrupting spoke,Tyrant, I well deserv'd thy galling chain. Pope's Iliad.
 To impair; to wear away.
He doth object, I am too great of birth;And that my state being gall'd with my expence,I seek to heal it only by his wealth. Shakespeare.
If it should fall down in a continual stream like a river, it would gall the ground, wash away plants by the roots, and overthrow houses. Ray on the Creation.
 To teaze; to fret; to vex.
In honour of that action, and to gall their minds who did not so much commend it, he wrote his book. Hooker, b. ii.
What they seem contented with, even for that very cause we reject; and there is nothing but it pleaseth us the better, if we espy that it galleth them. Hooker, b. iv. s. 9.
            When I shew justice,I pity those I do not know;Which a dismiss'd offence would after gall. Shakespeare.
Let it not gall your patience, good Iago,That I extend my manners: 'tis my breeding,That gives me this bold shew of courtesy. Shakesp. Othello.
    All studies here I solemnly defy,Save how to gall and pinch this Bolingbroke. Shak. H. IV.
No man commits any sin but his conscience smites him, and his guilty mind is frequently galled with the remembrance of it. Tillotson's Sermons.
 To harrass; to mischief.
The Helots had gotten new heart, and with divers sorts of shot from corners of streets and house-windows galled them. Sidney.
Light demilances from afar they throw,Fasten'd with leathern thongs, to gall the foe. Dryd. Æn.
In our wars against the French of old, we used to gall them with our long bows, at a greater distance than they could shoot their arrows. Addison on the State of the War.

Galligaskins
Ga'lligaskins. n.s. [Caligæ Gallo-Vasconum. Skinner.] Large open hose.
My galligaskins, that have long withstoodThe Winter's fury, and encroaching frosts,By time subdu'd, what will not time subdue,An horrid chasm disclose. Phillips.

Gallow (noun)
Ga'llow.Ga'llows.

n.s. [It is used by some in the singular; but by more only in the plural, or sometimes has another plural gallowses. Galga, Gothick; ᵹalᵹa; Saxon; galge, Dutch; which some derive from gabalus, furca, Latin; others from נבה high; others from gallu, Welsh, power: but it is probably derived like gallow, to fright, from aᵹælƿan, the gallows being the great object of legal terrour.]



 A beam laid over two posts, on which malefactors are hanged.
This monster sat like a hangman upon a pair of gallows: in his right hand he was painted holding a crown of laurel, in his left hand a purse of money. Sidney, b. ii.
 I would we were all of one mind, and one mind good; O, there were desolation of gaolers and gallowses. Shakesp. Cymbel.
 I prophesied, if a gallows were on land, This fellow could not drown. Shakespeare's Tempest.
 A little before dinner he took the major aside, and whispered him in the ear, that execution must that day be done in the town, and therefore required him that a pair of gallows should be erected. Hayward.
 A production that naturally groweth under gallowses, and places of execution. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. ii.
 A poor fellow, going to the gallows, may be allowed to feel the smart of wasps while he is upon Tyburn road. Swift.
 A wretch that deserves the gallows.
 Cupid hath been five thousand years a boy. — Ay, and a shrewd unhappy gallows too. Shakespeare.

Gallow (verb)
To Ga'llow. v.a. [aᵹælƿan, to fright, Saxon.] To terrify; to fright.
                    The wrathful skies Gallow the very wand'rers of the dark, And make them keep their caves. Shakespeare's King Lear.

Galloway
Ga'lloway. n.s. A horse not more than fourteen hands high, much used in the North; probably as coming originally from Galloway, a shire in Scotland.

Gallowglasses
Ga'llowglasses. n.s.

 It is worn then likewise of footmen under their shirts of mail, the which footmen call gallowglasses: the which name doth discover them also to be ancient English; for gallogla signifies an English servitor or yeoman.  And he being so armed in a long shirt of mail, down to the calf of his leg, with a long broad ax in his hand, was then pedes gravis armaturæ; and was instead of the footman that now weareth a corslet, before the corslet was used, or almost invented. Spenser on Ireland.

 [Hanmer, otherwise than Spenser.] Soldiers among the wild Irish, who serve on horseback.
            A puissant and mighty pow'r Of gallowglasses and stout kernes, Is marching hitherward in proud array. Shakes. Henry VI.

Gallows
Ga'llow.Ga'llows.

n.s. [It is used by some in the singular; but by more only in the plural, or sometimes has another plural gallowses. Galga, Gothick; ᵹalᵹa; Saxon; galge, Dutch; which some derive from gabalus, furca, Latin; others from נבה high; others from gallu, Welsh, power: but it is probably derived like gallow, to fright, from aᵹælƿan, the gallows being the great object of legal terrour.]



 A beam laid over two posts, on which malefactors are hanged.
This monster sat like a hangman upon a pair of gallows: in his right hand he was painted holding a crown of laurel, in his left hand a purse of money. Sidney, b. ii.
 I would we were all of one mind, and one mind good; O, there were desolation of gaolers and gallowses. Shakesp. Cymbel.
 I prophesied, if a gallows were on land, This fellow could not drown. Shakespeare's Tempest.
 A little before dinner he took the major aside, and whispered him in the ear, that execution must that day be done in the town, and therefore required him that a pair of gallows should be erected. Hayward.
 A production that naturally groweth under gallowses, and places of execution. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. ii.
 A poor fellow, going to the gallows, may be allowed to feel the smart of wasps while he is upon Tyburn road. Swift.
 A wretch that deserves the gallows.
 Cupid hath been five thousand years a boy. — Ay, and a shrewd unhappy gallows too. Shakespeare.

Gammer
Ga'mmer. n.s. [Of uncertain etymology; perhaps from grand mere, and therefore used commonly to old women.] The compellation of a woman corresponding to gaffer.

Gamut
Ga'mut. n.s. [gama, Italian.] The scale of musical notes.
 Madam, before you touch the instrument, To learn the order of my fingering, I must begin with rudiments of art, To teach you gamut in a briefer sort. Shakespeare.
 When by the gamut some musicians make A perfect song, others will undertake, By the same gamut chang'd, to equal it: Things simply good can never be unfit. Donne.
 Long has a race of heroes fill'd the stage, That rant by note, and through the gamut rage; In songs and airs express their martial fire, Combat in trills, and in a feuge expire. Addison.

Gang (noun)
Gang. n.s. [from the verb.] A number herding together; a troop; a company; a tribe; a herd. It is seldom used but in contempt or abhorrence.
 Oh, you panderly rascals! there's a knot, a gang, a pack, a conspiracy against me. Shakes. Merry Wives of Windsor.
 As a gang of thieves were robbing a house, a mastiff fell a barking. L'Estrange, Fable 21.
 Admitted in among the gang, He acts and talks as they befriend him. Prior.

Gang (verb)
To Gang. v.n. [gangen, Dutch; ᵹanᵹan, Saxon; gang, Scottish.] To go; to walk; an old word not now used, except ludicrously.
             But let them gang alone, As they have brewed, so let them bear blame. Spenser.
 Your flaunting beaus gang with their breasts open. Arbuthn.

Gaol
Gaol. n.s. [gaol, Welsh; geole, French.] A prison; a place of confinement.  It is always pronounced and too often written jail, and sometimes goal.
Then am I the prisoner, and his bed my gaol. Sh. K. Lear.
Have I been ever free, and must my houseBe my retentive enemy, my gaol? Shakespeare's Timon.
If we mean to thrive and do good, break open the gaols, and let out the prisoners. Shakespeare's Henry VI. p. ii.

Garden
Ga'rden. n.s. [gardd, Welsh; jardin, French; giardino, Italian.]

 A piece of ground inclosed, and cultivated with extraordinary care, planted with herbs or fruits for food, or laid out for pleasure.
Thy promises are like Adonis' gardens,Which one day bloom'd and fruitful were the next. Shakes.
My lord of Ely, when I was last in Holbourn,I saw good strawberries in your garden there. Shakes. R. III.
In the royal ordering of gardens, there ought to be gardens for all the months in the year. Bacon's Essays.
In every garden should be provided flowers, fruit, shade and water. Temple.
 A place particularly fruitful or delightful.
I am arriv'd from fruitful Lombardy,The pleasant garden of great Italy. Shak. Tam. of the Shrew.
 Garden is often used in composition for hortensis, or belonging to a garden.

Gargarism
Ga'rgarism. n.s. [γαργαρισμὸς; gargarisme, French.] A liquid form of medicine to wash the mouth with. Quincy.
 Apophlegmatisms and gargarisms draw the rheum down by the palate. Bacon's Natural History.

Gargarize
To Gargari'ze. v.a. [γαργαρίζω; gargariser, French.] To wash the mouth with medicated liquors.
 Vinegar, put to the nostrils, or gargarized, doth ease the hiccough; for that it is astringent, and inhibiteth the motion of the spirit. Bacon's Natural History.
 This being relaxed, may make a shaking of the larynx; as when we gargarize. Holder's Elements of Speech.

Garrison (noun)
Ga'rrison. n.s. [garnison, French.]

 Soldiers placed in a fortified town or castle to defend it.
              How oft he said to me, Thou art no soldier fit for Cupid's garrison. Sidney, b. i.
 Fortified place stored with soldiers.
 Whom the old Roman wall so ill confin'd, With a new chain of garrisons you bind. Waller.
 The state of being placed in a fortification for its defence.
 Some of them that are laid in garrison will do no great hurt to the enemies. Spenser on Ireland.

Garrison (verb)
To Ga'rrison. v.a. [from the verb.] To secure by fortresses.
                     Others those forces join, Which garrison the conquests near the Rhine. Dryd. Juven.

Gauge (verb)
To Gauge. v.a. [gauge, jauge, a measuring rod, French.  It is pronounced gage.]

 To measure with respect to the contents of a vessel.

 To measure with regard to any proportion.
The vanes nicely gauged on each side, broad on one side, and narrow on the other, both which minister to the progressive motion of the bird. Derham's Physico-Theology.
There is nothing more perfectly admirable in itself than that artful manner in Homer's battles of taking measure or gaging his heroes by each other, and thereby elevating the character of one person by the opposition of it to some other he is made to excel. Pope's Essay on Homer's Battles.

Gay (adjective)
Gay. adj. [gay, French.]

 Airy, chearful; merry; frolick.
Smooth flow the waves, the zephyrs gently play;Belinda smil'd, and all the world was gay. Pope.
Ev'n rival wits did Voiture's fate deplore,And the gay mourn'd, who never mourn'd before. Pope.
 Fine; showy.
A virgin that loves to go gay. Bar. vi. 9

Gay (noun)
Gay. n.s. [from the adjective.] An ornament; an embellishment.
Morose and untractable spirits look upon precepts in emblem, as they do upon gays and pictures, the fooleries of so many old wives tales. L'Estrange.

Gayety
Ga'yety. n.s. [gayeté, French, from gay.]

 Chearfulness; airiness; merriment.

 Acts of juvenile pleasure.
And from those gayeties our youth requiresTo exercise their minds, our age retires. Denham.
 Finery; show.
Our gayety and our gilt are all besmirch'd,With rainy marching in the painful field. Shakesp. H. V.

Gayly
Ga'yly. adv. Merrily; chearfully; showily.

Gayness
Ga'yness. n.s. [from gay.] Gayety; finery. Not much in use.

Geason
Gea'son. adj. [A word which I find only in Spenser.] Wonderful.
It to Leeches seemed strange and geason. Hubbard's Tale.

Geat
Geat. n.s. [corrupted from jett.] The hole through which the metal runs into the mold. Moxon's Mech. Exer.

Geck (noun)
Geck. n.s. [ᵹac, a cuckow; geck, German, a fool; gawk, Scottish.] A bubble easily imposed upon. Hanmer.
Why did you suffer Jachimo to taint his noble heart and brain with needless jealousy, and to become the geck and scorn o' th' other's villany? Shakespeare's Cymbeline.
Why have you suffer'd me to be imprison'd, And made the most notorious geck and gull That e'er invention plaid on? Shakesp. Twelfth Night.

Geck (verb)
To Geck. v.a. [from the noun.] To cheat; to trick.

Gee
Gee. A term used by waggoners to their horses when they would have them go faster.

Geese
Geese. The plural of goose.

Gelable
Ge'lable. adj. [from gelu, Latin.] What may be congealed or concreted into a gelly.

Gelatine
Ge'latine.Gela'tinous.

 adj. [gelatus, Latin.] Formed into a gelly; viscous; stiff and cohesive.


That pellucid gelatinous substance is an excrement cast off from the shoals of fish that inhabit the main. Woodward.
You shall always see their eggs laid carefully up in that spermatick gelatine matter, in which they are reposited. Derh.

Gelatinous
Ge'latine.Gela'tinous.

 adj. [gelatus, Latin.] Formed into a gelly; viscous; stiff and cohesive.


That pellucid gelatinous substance is an excrement cast off from the shoals of fish that inhabit the main. Woodward.
You shall always see their eggs laid carefully up in that spermatick gelatine matter, in which they are reposited. Derh.

Geld
To Geld. v.a. preter. gelded or gelt; part. pass. gelded or gelt. [gelten, German.]

 To castrate; to deprive of the power of generation.
 Geld bull-calf and ram lamb as soon as they fall. Tusser.
 Lord Say hath gelded the commonwealth, and made it an eunuch. Shakesp. Henry VI.
 To deprive of any essential part.
          He bears his course, and runs me upWith like advantage on the other side,Gelding th' oppos'd continent as muchAs on the other side it takes from you. Shakesp. Henry IV.
 To deprive of any thing immodest, or liable to objection.
 They were diligent enough to make sure work, and to geld it so clearly in some places that they took away the very manhood of it. Dryden's Preface to Cleomenes.

Gelder
Ge'lder. n.s. [from geld.] One that performs the act of castration.
Geld later with gelders, as many one do,And look of a dozen to geld away two. Tuss. Husbandry.
No sow gelder did blow his hornTo geld a cat, but cry'd reform. Hudibras, p. i. cant. 2.

Gelder-rose
Ge'lder-rose. n.s. [I suppose brought from Guelderland.]
The leaves are like those of  the maple-tree: the flowers consist of one leaf, which expands in a circular rose form, and is divided at the top into five parts: these are collected in form of an umbel, the largest of which grow on the outside and are barren; but those in the middle are fruitful, producing red berries, in each of which is contained one flat heart-shaped seed.
The species are three.  If the soil be moist, this plant affords a very agreeable prospect, both in the season when it is in flower, and also in the Autumn, when the fruit is ripe, which generally grows in large clusters, and is of a beautiful colour.  Miller.
The gelder-rose is increased by suckers and cuttings. Mort.

Gelding
Ge'lding. n.s. [from geld.] Any animal castrated, particularly an horse.
Though naturally there be more males of horses, bulls or rams than females; yet artifically, that is, by making geldings, oxen and weathers, there are fewer. Graunt.
The lord lieutenant may chuse out one of the best horses, and two of the best geldings; for which shall be paid one hundred pounds for the horse, and fifty pounds a-piece for the geldings. Temple.

Gelid
Ge'lid. adj. [gelidus, Latin.] Extremely cold.
From the deep ooze and gelid cavern rous'd, They flounce. Thomson's Spring.

Gelidity
Geli'dity. n.s. [from gelid.] Extreme cold. Dict.

Gelidness
Ge'lidness. n.s. [from gelid.] Extreme cold. Dict.

Gelly
Ge'lly. n.s. [gelatus, Latin.] Any viscous body; viscidity; glue, gluey substance.
                     My best blood turn To an infected gelly. Shakespeare's Winter's Tale.
                     The tapers of the gods, The sun and moon, became like waxen globes, The shooting stars end all in purple gellies, And chaos is at hand. Dryden and Lee's Oedipus.
The white of an egg will coagulate by a moderate heat, and the hardest of animal solids are resolvable again into gellies. Arbuthnot on Aliments.

Gemelliparous
Gemélliparous. adj. [gemelli and pario, Latin.] Bearing twins. Dict.

General (adjective)
Ge'neral. adj. [general, French; generalis, Latin.]

 Comprehending many species or individuals; not special; not particular.
To conclude from particulars to generals is a false way of arguing. Notes to Pope's Odyssey.
 Lax in signification; not restrained to any special or particular import.
Where the author speaks more strictly and particularly on any theme, it will explain the more loose and general expressions. Watt's Improvement of the Mind.
 Not restrained by narrow or distinctive limitations.
A general idea is an idea in the mind, considered there as separated from time and place, and so capable to represent any particular being that is conformable to it. Locke.
 Relating to a whole class or body of men, or a whole kind of any being.
They, because some have been admitted without trial, make that fault general which is particular. Whitgifte.
 Publick; comprising the whole.
Nor would we deign him burial of his men, 'Till he disburs'd, at Saint Colmeskill isIe, Ten thousand dollars to our gen'ral use. Shakesp. Macbeth.
Nor fail'd they to express how much they prais'd, That for the general safety he despis'd His own. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ii.
 Not directed to any single object.
 If the same thing be peculiarly evil, that general aversion will be turned into a particular hatred against it. Spratt.
 Extensive, though not universal.

 Common; usual.
                    I've been bold, For that I knew it the most general way. Shakesp. Timon.
 General is appended to several offices: as, Attorney General, Solicitor General, Vicar General.

Geoponicks
Geopónicks. n.s. [γῆ and πόνος.] The science of cultivating the ground; the doctrine of agriculture.

Gewgaw (adjective)
Géwgaw. adj. Splendidly trifling; showy without value.
Let him that would learn the happiness of religion, see the poor gewgaw happiness of Feliciano. Law's Serious Call.

Gewgaw (noun)
Géwgaw. n.s. [ʒeʒaf, Saxon; joyau, French.] A showy trifle; a toy; a bauble; a splendid plaything.
That metal they exchanged for the meanest trifles and gewgaws which the others could bring. Abbot's Desc. of the World.
Prefer that which providence has pronounced to be the staff of life, before a glittering gewgaw that has no other value than what vanity has set upon it. L'Estrange, Fable 1.
As children, when they throw one toy away,Straight a more foolish gewgaw comes in play. Dryden.
A heavy gewgaw, call'd a crown, that spreadAbout his temples, drown'd his narrow head,And would have crush'd it. Dryden's Juvenal, Sat. 10.
                Some loose the bandsOf ancient friendship, cancel nature's lawsFor pageantry and tawdry gewgaws. Phillips.
The first images were fans, silks, ribbands, laces, and many other gewgaws, which lay so thick that the whole heart was nothing else but a toyshop. Addison's Guard.

Gherkin
Ghérkin. n.s. [from gurcke, German, a cucumber.] A pickled cucumber. Skinner.

Ghess
To Ghess. v.n. [See To Guess. Ghess is by criticks considered as the true orthography, but guess has universally prevailed.] To conjecture.

Ghost (noun)
Ghost. n.s. [ʒast, Saxon.]

 The soul of man.
Vex not his ghost: O, let him pass! He hates him,That would upon the rack of this rough worldStretch him out longer. Shakespeare's King Lear.
                Often did I striveTo yield the ghost; but still the envious floodKept in my soul. Shak. R. III.
Man, when once cut down, when his pale ghostFleets into air, is for ever lost. Sandys's Paraphrase.
 A spirit appearing after death.
The mighty ghosts of our great Harrys rose,And armed Edwards look'd with anxious eyes,To see this fleet among unequal foes,By which fate promis'd them their Charles should rise. Dryd.
 To give up the Ghost. To die; to yield up the spirit into the hands of God.
        Their shadows seemA canopy most fatal, under whichOur army lies ready to give up the ghost. Shakesp. Jul. Cæs.
 The third person in the adorable Trinity, called the Holy Ghost.

Gibbe
Gíbbe. n.s. Any old worn-out animal. Hanmer.
For who that's but a queen, fair, sober, wise,Would from a paddock, from a bat, a gibbe,Such dear concernings hide? Shakespeare's Hamlet.

Gibbet (noun)
Gi'bbet. n.s. [gibet, French.]

 A gallows; the post on which malefactors are hanged, or on which their carcases are exposed.
 When was there ever cursed atheist brought Unto the gibbet, but he did adore That blessed pow'r which he had set at nought? Davies.
 You scandal to the stock of verse, a race Able to bring the gibbet in disgrace. Cleaveland.
 Haman suffered death himself upon the very gibbet that he had provided for another. L'Estrange.
 Papers of universal approbation, lay such principles to the whole body of the Tories, as, if they were true, our next business should be to erect gibbets in every parish, and hang them out of the way. Swift.
 Any traverse beams.

Gibbet (verb)
To Gi'bbet. v.n. [from the noun.]

 To hang or expose on a gibbet.
 I'll gibbet up his name. Oldham.
 To hang on any thing going traverse: as the beam of a gibbet.
 He shall come off and on swifter than he that gibbets on the brewer's bucket. Shakespeare's Henry IV. p. ii.

Gibbier


Gibbosity


Gibbous


Gibbousness


Gibcat


Gibe (noun)
Gibe. n.s. [from the verb.] Sneer; hint of contempt by word or look; scoff; act or expression of scorn; taunt.
         Mark the fleers, the gibes, and notable scorns That dwell in ev'ry region of his face. Shakesp. Othello.
         The rich have still a gibe in store, And will be monstrous witty on the poor. Dryden's Juven.
If they would hate from the bottom of their hearts, their aversion would be too strong for little gibes every moment. Spectator, № 300.
But the dean, if this secret shou'd come to his ears, Will never have done with his gibes and his jeers. Swift.

Gibe (verb active)
To Gibe. v.a. To reproach by contemptuous hints; to flout; to scoff; to ridicule; to treat with scorn; to sneer; to taunt.
 When rioting in Alexandria: you Did pocket up my letters, and with taunts Did gibe my missive out of audience. Shakes. Ant. and Cleop.
 Draw the beasts as I describe them, From their features, while I gibe them. Swift.

Gibe (verb neuter)
To Gibe. v.n. [gaber, old French. to sneer, to ridicule.] To sneer; to join censoriousness with contempt.
 They seem to imagine that we have erected of late a frame of some new religion, the furniture whereof we should not have borrowed from our enemies, lest they should afterwards laugh and gibe at our party. Hooker, b. iv. s. 9.
 When he saw her toy, and gibe, and geer, And pass the bounds of modest merry-make, Her dalliance he despis'd. Fairy Queen, b. ii. cant. 6.
 Why that's the way to choke a gibing spirit, Whose influence is begot of that loose grace Which shallow laughing hearers give to fools. Shakespeare.
 Thus with talents well endu'd To be scurrilous and rude, When you pertly raise your snout, Fleer and gibe, and laugh and flout. Swift.

Giber
Gi'ber. n.s. [from gibe.] A sneerer; one who turns others to ridicule by contemptuous hints; a scoffer; a taunter.
You are well understood to be a more perfect giber of the table, than a necessary bencher of the capitol. Shakes. Cor.
         Come, Sempronia, leave him; He is a giber, and our present business Is of more serious consequence. Ben Johnson's Catiline.

Gibingly
Gi'bingly. adv. [from gibe.] Scornfully; contemptuously.
                 His present portance, gibingly and ungravely he did fashion After th' inveterate hate he bears to you. Shakes. Coriolanus.

Giblets
Gi'blets. n.s. [According to Minshew from gibbet, gobblet: according to Junius more probably from gibier, game, Fr.] The parts of a goose which are cut off before it is roasted.
'Tis holyday; provide me better cheer: 'Tis holyday; and shall be round the year: Shall I my houshold gods and genius cheat, To make him rich who grudges me my meat? That he may loll at ease; and pamper'd high, When I am laid, may feed on giblet pie? Dryden's Perf.

Giddily


Giddiness


Giddy


Giddybrained


Gipsy
Gípsy. n.s. [Corrupted from Egyptian; for when they first appeared in Europe they declared, and perhaps truly, that they were driven from Egypt by the Turks. They are now mingled with all nations.]

 A vagabond who pretends to foretell futurity, commonly by palmestry or physiognomy.
 The butler, though he is sure to lose a knife, a fork, or a spoon every time his fortune is told him, shuts himself up in the pantry with an old gipsy for above half an hour. Addison.
 A frantick gipsey now, the house he haunts, And in wild phrases speaks dissembled wants. Prior.
 I, near yon stile, three sallow gypsies met; Upon my hand they cast a poring look, Bid me beware, and thrice their heads they shook. Gay.
 In this still labyrinth around her lie Spells, philters, globes, and spheres of palmistry; A sigil in this hand the gipsy bears, In th' other a prophetick sieve and sheers. Garth's Dispensat.
 A reproachful name for a dark complexion.
 Laura, to his lady, was but a kitchen-wench; Dido a dowdy; Cleopatra a gipsy; Helen and Hero hildings and harlots. Shakespeare's Romeo and Juliet.
 A name of slight reproach to a woman.
 The widow play'd the gypsy, and so did her confidant too, in pretending to believe her. L'Estrange.
 A slave I am to Clara's eyes: The gipsy knows her pow'r and flies. Prior.

Girasole
Gírasole. n.s. [girasol, French.]

 The herb turnsol.

 The opal stone.

Gird (noun)
Gird. n.s. [from the verb] A twitch; a pang: from the sensation caused by a bandage or girdle drawn hard suddenly. This word is now seldom used.
 Sweet king! the bishop hath a kindly gird: For shame, my lord of Winchester, relent. Shakes. H. VI.
 They give satisfaction to his mind, and his conscience by this means is freed from many fearful girds and twinges which the atheist feels. Tillotson, Sermon 2.
 He has the glory of his conscience, when he doth well, to set against the checks and girds of it when he doth amiss. Goodman's Winter Evening Con.

Gird (verb active)
To Gird. v.a. pret. girded, or girt. [ʒẏrdan, Saxon.]

 To bind round.
 They sprinkled earth upon their heads, and girded their loins with sackcloth. 2 Mac. x. 25.
 To put on so as to surround or bind.
 Cords of the bigness of packthread were fastened to bandages, which the workmen had girt round my neck. Gulliver.
 To fasten by binding.
 He girt his warlike harness about him. 1 Mac. iii. 3.
 My bow and thunder, my almighty arms Gird on, and sword upon thy puissant thigh. Milt. P. Lost.
 No, let us rise at once, gird on our swords, And, at the head of our remaining troops, Attack the foe. Addison's Cato.
 The combatant too late the field declines, When now the sword is girded to his loins. Prior.
 To invest.
 Stoop then, and set your knee against my foot; And in reguerdon of that duty done, I gird thee with the valiant sword of York. Shakesp. H. VI.
             The son appear'd, Girt with omnipotence. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. vii.
 To dress; to habit; to clothe.
 I girded thee about with fine linen, and I covered thee with silk. Ezek. xvi. 10.
             Tysiphone there keeps the ward, Girt in her sanguine gown, by night and day, Observant of the souls that pass the downward way. Dryd.
 To cover round as a garment.
 These, with what skill they had, together sow'd, To gird their waist: vain covering, if to hide Their guilt, and dreaded shame! Milton's Paradise Lost.
 To reproach; to gibe.
 Being mov'd, he will not spare to gird the gods. Shakes.
 To furnish; to equip.
 So to the coast of Jordan he directs His easy steps, girded with snaky wiles. Paradise Regain'd.
 To inclose; to incircle.
                     That Nyseian isle, Girt with the river Triton, where old Cham Hid Amalthea, and her florid son Young Bacchus, from his stepdame Rhea's eye. Milt. P. L.

Gird (verb neuter)
To Gird. v.n. To break a scornful jest; to gibe; to sneer.
 Men of all sorts take a pride to gird at me: the brain of this foolish compounded clay, man, is not able to invent any thing that tends to laughter more than I invent, or is invented on me: I am not only witty in myself, but the cause that wit is in other men. Shakespeare's Henry IV. p. ii.

Girder
Gírder. n.s. [from gird.] In architecture, the largest piece of timber in a floor.  Its end is usually fastened into the summers, or breast summers, and the joints are framed in at one arm to the girders. Harris.
 The girders are also to be of the same scantling the summers and ground-plates are of, though the back girder need not be so strong as the front girder. Moxon's Mech. Exer.
 These mighty girders which the fabrick bind, These ribs robust and vast in order join'd. Blackm. Creation.

Gisle
Gísle. Among the English Saxons, signifies a pledge: thus Fredgisle is a pledge of peace; Gislebert an illustrious pledge, like the Greek Homerus. Gibson's Camden.

Gith
Gith. n.s. An herb called Guiney pepper.

Give (verb active)
To Give. v.a. preter. gave; part. pass. given. [ʒifan, Saxon.]

 To bestow; to confer without any price or reward.
This opinion abated the fear of death in them which were so resolved, and gave them courage to all adventures. Hooker.
Give us of your oil, for our lamps are gone out. Mat. xxv.
Give us also sacrifices and burnt offerings, that we may sacrifice unto the Lord. Ex. x. 25.
I had a master that gave me all I could ask, but thought fit to take one thing from me again. Temple.
Constant at church and change; his gains were sure,His givings rare, save farthings to the poor. Pope's Epistles.
 To transmit from himself to another by hand, speech, or writing; to deliver; to impart; to communicate.
The woman whom thou gavest to be with me, she gave me of the tree, and I did eat. Gen. iii. 12.
They were eating and drinking, marrying and giving in marriage. Mat. xxiv. 38.
Those bills were printed not only every week, but also a general account of the whole year was given in upon the Thursday before Christmas. Graunt's Bills of Mortality.
We shall give an account of these phenomena. Burnet.
Aristotle advises not poets to put things evidently false and impossible into their poems, nor gives them licence to run out into wildness. Broome's Notes on the Odyssey.
 To put into one's possession; to consign.
Nature gives us many children and friends, to take them away; but takes none away to give them us again. Temple.
Give me, says Archimedes, where to stand firm, and I will remove the earth. Temple.
If the agreement of men first gave a sceptre into any one's hands, or put a crown on his head, that almost must direct its conveyance. Locke.
 To pay as price or reward, or in exchange.
All that a man hath will he give for his life. Job ii. 4.
If you did know to whom I gave the ring,If you did know for whom I gave the ring,And would conceive for what I gave the ring,And how unwillingly I left the ring,You would abate the strength of your displeasure. Shakesp.
He would give his nuts for a piece of metal, and exchange his sheep for shells, or wool for a sparkling pebble. Locke.
 To yield; not to withhold.
Philip, Alexander's father, gave sentence against a prisoner what time he was drowsy, and seemed to give small attention.  The prisoner, after sentence was pronounced, said, I appeal: the king, somewhat stirred, said, To whom do you appeal? The prisoner answered, From Philip, when he gave no ear, to Philip, when he shall give ear. Bacon's Apophthegms.
Constantia accused herself for having so tamely given an ear to the proposal. Addison's Spectator.
 To quit; to yield as due.
Give place, thou stranger, to an honourable man. Ecclus.
 To confer; to impart.
I will bless her, and give thee a son also of her. Gen. xvii.
Nothing can give that to another which it hath not itself. Bramh. against Hobbs.
What beauties I lose in some places, I give to others which had them not originally. Dryden's Fables, Preface.
 To expose.
All clad in skins of beasts the jav'lin bear;Give to the wanton winds their flowing hair. Dryd. Æn.
 To grant; to allow.
'Tis given me once again to behold my friend. Rowe.
He has not given Luther fairer play. Atterbury.
 To yield; not to deny.
I gave his wise proposal way;Nay, urg'd him to go on: the shallow fraudWill ruin him. Rowe's Ambitious Stepmother.
 To yield without resistance.

 To permit; to commission.
                    PrepareThe due libation and the solemn pray'r;Then give thy friend to shed the sacred wine. Pope's Odyss.
 To enable; to allow.
God himself requireth the lifting up of pure hands in prayers; and hath given the world to understand, that the wicked, though they cry, shall not be heard. Hooker.
                    Give me to knowHow this foul rout began, who set it on. Shakes. Othello.
So some weak shoot, which else would poorly rise,Jove's tree adopts; and lifts into the skies;Through the new pulpil fost'ring juices flow,Thrust forth the gems, and give the flow'rs to blow. Tickel.
 To pay.
The applause and approbation, most reverend for thy stretcht-out life, I give to both your speeches. Shak. Triol. and Cressida.
 To utter; to vent; to pronounce.
So you must be the first that gives this sentence,And he that suffers. Shakesp. Measure for Measure.
The Rhodians seeing their enemies turn their backs, gave a great shout in derision of them. Knolles's Hist. of the Turks.
Let the first honest discoverer give the word about, that Wood's halfpence have been offered, and caution the poor people not to receive them. Swift.
 To exhibit; to express.
This instance gives the impossibility of an eternal existence in any thing essentially alterable or corruptible. Hale.
 To exhibit as the product of a calculation.
The number of men being divided by the number of ships, gives four hundred and twenty-four men a-piece. Arbuthnot.
 To do any act of which the consequence reaches others.
As we desire to give no offence ourselves, so neither shall we take any at the difference of judgment in others. Burnet.
 To exhibit; to send forth as odours from any body.
In oranges the ripping of their rind giveth out their smell more. Bacon.
 To addict; to apply.
The Helots, of the other side, shutting their gates, gave themselves to bury their dead, to cure their wounds, and rest their wearied bodies. Sidney.
After men began to grow to number, the first thing we read they gave themselves into, was the tilling of the earth and the feeding of cattle. Hooker, b. i.
Groves and hill-altars were dangerous, in regard of the secret access which people superstitiously given might have always thereunto with ease. Hooker, b. v. s. 17.
The duke is virtuous, mild, and too well given,To dream on evil, or to work my downfal. Shakes. H. VI.
Fear him not, Cæsar, he's not dangerous:He is a noble Roman, and well given. Shakes. Julius Cæsar.
His name is Falstaff: if that man should be lewdly given, he deceives me; for, Harry, I see virtue in his looks. Shakesp.
Huniades, the scourge of the Turks, was dead long before; so was also Mathias: after whom succeeded others, given all to pleasure and ease. Knolles's History of the Turks.
Though he was given to pleasure, yet he was likewise desirous of glory. Bacon's Henry VII.
He that giveth his mind to the law of the most High, will seek out the wisdom of all the ancients. Ecclus. xxxix. 1.
He is much given to contemplation, and the viewing of this theatre of the world. More's Antidote against Atheism.
They who gave themselves to warlike action and enterprises, went immediately to the palace of Odin. Temple.
Men are given to this licentious humour of scoffing at personal blemishes and defects. L'Estrange.
Besides, he is too much given to horseplay in his raillery; and comes to battle, like a dictator from the plough. Dryden.
I have some business of importance with her; but her husband is so horribly given to be jealous. Dryd. Spanish Fryar.
What can I refuse to a man so charitably given? Dryden.
 To resign; to yield up.
Finding ourselves in the midst of the greatest wilderness of waters, without victual, we gave ourselves for lost men, and prepared for death. Bacon's New Atlantis.
Who say, I care not, those I give for lost;And to instruct them, will not quit the cost. Herbert.
                Virtue giv'n for lost,Deprest and overthrown, as seem'd;Like that self-begott'n birdIn the Arabian woods embost,That no second knows, nor third,And lay erewhile a holocaust,From out her ashy womb now teem'd. Milton's Agonistes.
Since no deep within her gulph can holdImmortal vigour, though oppress'd and fall'n,I give not heaven for lost. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ii.
For a man to give his name to Christianity in those days, was to lift himself a martyr. South.
Ours gives himself for gone; you've watch'd your time,He fights this day unarm'd, without his rhyme. Dryden.
The parents, after a long search for the body, gave him for drowned in one of the canals. Addison's Spectator.
As the hinder feet of the horse stuck to the mountain, while the body reared up in the air, the poet with great difficulty kept himself from sliding off his back, in so much that the people gave him for gone. Addison's Guardian.
 To conclude; to suppose.
Whence came you here, O friend, and whither bound?All gave you lost on far Cyclopean ground. Garth's Ovid.
 To Give away. To alienate from one's self; to make over to another; to transfer.
The more he got, the more he shewed that he gave away to his new mistress, when he betrayed his promises to the former. Sidney, b. ii.
            If you shall marry,You give away this hand, and that is mine;You give away heav'n's vows, and those are mine;You give away myself, which is known mine. Shakespeare.
Honest company, I thank you all,That have beheld me give away myselfTo this most patient, sweet, and virtuous wife. Shakespeare.
I know not how they sold themselves; but thou, like a kind fellow, gav'st thyself away gratis, and I thank thee for thee. Shakespeare's Henry IV. p. ii.
Love gives away all things, that so he may advance the interest of the beloved person. Taylor's Rule of living holy.
But we who give our native rights away,And our enslav'd posterity betray,Are now reduc'd to beg an alms, and goOn holidays to see a puppet-show. Dryden's Juvenal's Sat.
Alas, said I, man was made in vain! How is he given away to misery and mortality! Addison's Spectator, № 159.
Theodosius arrived at a religious house in the city, where Constantia resided, and made himself one of the order, with a private vow never to inquire after Constantia, whom he looked upon as given away to his rival, upon the day on which their marriage was to have been solemnized. Addison's Spectat.
Whatsoever we employ in charitable uses, during our lives, is given away from ourselves: what we bequeath at our death, is given from others only, as our nearest relations. Atterbury.
 To Give back. To return; to restore.
'Till their vices perhaps give back all those advantages which their victories procured. Atterbury's Sermons.
 To Give forth. To publish; to tell.
Soon after it was given forth, and believed by many, that the king was dead. Hayward.
 To Give the hand. To yield pre-eminence, as being subordinate or inferior.
Lessons being free from some inconveniences, whereunto sermons are more subject, they may in this respect no less take than in others they must give the hand, which betokeneth pre-eminence. Hooker.
 To Give over. To leave; to quit; to cease.
Let novelty therefore in this give over endless contradictions, and let ancient customs prevail. Hooker.
It may be done rather than that be given over. Hooker.
          &nbs; Never give her o'er;For scorn at first makes after love the more. Shakespeare.
If Desdemona will return me my jewels, I will give over my suit, and repent my unlawful solicitation. Shakes. Othello.
Abdemelech, as one weary of the world, gave over all, and betook himself to a solitary life, and became monk. Knolles.
All the soldiers, from the highest to the lowest, had solemnly sworn to defend the city, and not to give it over unto the last man. Knolles's History of the Turks.
Sleep hath forsook and giv'n me o'erTo death's benuming opium, as my only cure. Milton.
Those troops, which were levied, have given over the prosecution of the war. Clarendon, b. viii.
But worst of all to give her over,'Till she's as desperate to recover. Hudibras, p. iii. cant. 3.
'Tis not amiss, e'er y' are giv'n o'er,To try one desp'rate med'cine more;And where your case can be no worse,The desp'ratest is the wisest course. Hudibras, p. ii.
A woman had a hen that laid every day an egg: she fancied that upon a larger allowance this hen might lay twice a day; but the hen grew fat, and gave quite over laying. L'Estrange.
Many have given over their pursuits after fame, either from the disappointments they have met, or from their experience of the little pleasure which attends it. Addison's Spectator.
 To Give over. To addict; to attach to.
Zelmane, govern and direct me; for I am wholly given over unto thee. Sidney, b. ii.
When the Babylonians had given themselves over to all manner of vice, it was time for the Lord, who had set up that empire, to pull it down. Grew's Cosmol. b. iii. c. 3.
I used one thing ill, or gave myself so much over to it as to neglect what I owed either to him or the rest of the world. Temple's Miscellanies.
 To Give over. To conclude lost.
Since it is lawful to practise upon them that are forsaken and given over, I will adventure to prescribe to you. Suckling.
The abbess, finding that the physicians had given her over, told her that Theodosius was just gone before her, and had sent her his benediction. Addison's Spectator, № 164.
Her condition was now quite desperate, all regular physicians, and her nearest relations, having given her over. Arbuth.
Yet this false comfort never gives him o'er,That, whilst he creeps, his vigorous thoughts can soar. Pope.
Not one foretells I shall recover;But all agree to give me over. Swift.
 To Give over. To abandon.
The duty of uniformity throughout all churches, in all manner of indifferent ceremonies, will be very hard, and therefore best to give it over. Hooker, b. iv. s. 13.
The cause, for which we fought and sworeSo boldly, shall we now give o'er? Hudibras, p. i. cant. 2.
 To Give out. To proclaim; to publish; to utter.
The fathers give it out for a rule, that whatsoever Christ is said in Scripture to have received, the same we ought to apply only to the manhood of Christ. Hooker, b. v. s. 54.
It is given out, that, sleeping in my orchard,A serpent stung me.  So the whole ear of DenmarkIs, by a forged process of my death,Rankly abused. Shakespeare's Hamlet.
One that gives out himself prince Florizel,Son of Polixenes, with his princess. Shakes. Winter's Tale.
It hath been given out, by an hypocritical thief, who was the first master of my ship, that I carried with me out of England twenty-two thousand of twenty-two shillings per piece. Raleigh's Apology.
He gave out general summons for the assembly of his council for the wars. Knolles's History of the Turks.
The night was distinguished by the orders which he gave out to his army, that they should forbear all insulting of their enemies. Addison's Freeholder, № 49.
 To Give out. To show in false appearance.
His givings out were of an infinite distanceFrom his true meant design. Shakesp. Meas. for Measure.
She that, so young, could give out such a seeming,To seal her father's eyes up close as oak. Shakesp. Othello.
 To Give up. To resign; to quit; to yield.
The people, weary of the miseries of war, would give him up, if they saw him shrink. Sidney, b. ii.
He has betray'd your business, and given upFor certain drops of salt your city Rome. Shak. Coriolanus.
The sun, breaking out with his cheerful beams, revived many, before ready to give up the ghost for cold, and gave comfort to them all. Knolles's History of the Turks.
He found the lord Hopton in trouble for the loss of the regiment of foot at Alton, and with the unexpected assurance of the giving up of Arundel-castle. Clarendon, b. viii.
Let us give ourselves wholly up to Christ in heart and desire. Taylor's Rule of living holy.
Such an expectation will never come to pass; therefore I'll e'en give it up, and go and fret myself. Collier against Despair.
I can give up to the historians of your country the names of so many generals and heroes which crowd their annals. Dryd.
He declares himself to be now satisfied to the contrary, in which he has given up the cause. Dryden.
The leagues made between several states, disowning all claim to the land in the other's possession, have, by common consent, given up their pretences to their natural right. Locke.
If they give them up to their reasons, then they with them give up all truth and farther enquiry, and think there is no such thing as certainty. Locke.
We should see him give up again to the wild common of nature, whatever was more than would supply the conveniencies of life. Locke.
Juba's surrender, since his father's death,Would give up Africk into Cæsar's hands,And make him lord of half the burning zone. Addis. Cato.
Learn to be honest men, give up your leaders,And pardon shall descend on all the rest. Addison's Cato.
A popish priest threatened to excommunicate a Northumberland squire, if he did not give up to him the church lands. Addison's Freeholder.
He saw the celestial deities acting in a confederacy against him, and immediately gave up a cause which was excluded from all possibility of success. Addison's Freeholder.
An old gentleman, who had been engaged in an argument with the emperor, upon his friend's telling him he wondered he would give up the question when he had the better, I am never ashamed, says he, to be confuted by one who is master of fifty legions. Addison's Spectator, № 239.
He may be brought to give up the clearest evidence. Atterb.
The constant health and longevity of men must be given up also, as a groundless conceit. Bentley's Sermons.
Have the physicians giv'n up all their hopes?Cannot they add a few days to a monarch? Rowe.
These people were obliged to demand peace, and give up to the Romans all their possessions in Sicily. Arbuthnot.
Every one who will not ask for the conduct of God in the study of religion, has just reason to fear he shall be left of God, and given up a prey to a thousand prejudices, that he shall be consigned over to the follies of his own heart. Watts.
Give yourself up to some hours of leisure. Watts.
 To Give up. To abandon.
If any be given up to believe lyes, some must be first given up to tell them. Stillingfleet's Def. on Disc. on Rom. Idol.
Our minds naturally give themselves up to every diversion which they are much accustomed to; and we always find that play, when followed with assiduity, engrosses the whole woman. Addison's Guardian, № 120.
Give up your fond paternal pride,Nor argue on the weaker side. Swift.
A good poet no sooner communicates his works, but it is imagined he is a vain young creature given up to the ambition of fame. Pope.
I am obliged at this time to give up my whole application to Homer. Pope.
Persons who, through misfortunes, chuse not to dress, should not, however, give up neatness. Clarissa.
 To Give up. To deliver.
And Joab gave up the sum of the number of the people to the king. 2 Sa. xxiv. 9.
His accounts were confused, and he could not then give them up. Swift on the Dissent. in Athens and Rome.

Glabrity
Glábrity. n.s. [from glaber, Latin.] Smoothness; baldness. Dict.

Gladiator
Gladiátor. n.s. [Latin; gladiateur, Fr.] A swordplayer; a prizefighter.
 Then whilst his foe each gladiator soils, The atheist, looking on, enjoys the spoils. Denham.
 Besides, in gratitude for such high matters, Know I have vow'd two hundred gladiators. Dryden's Pers.

Glance (noun)
Glance. n.s. [glantz, German, glitter.]

 A sudden shoot of light or splendour.
 His off'ring soon propitious fire from heav'n Consum'd with nimble glance, and grateful steam: The other's not; for his was not sincere. Milt. Parad. Lost.
 A stroke or dart of the beam of sight.
 The aspects which procure love are not gazings, but sudden glances and dartings of the eye. Bacon's Nat. History.
 There are those sort of beauties which last but for a moment; some particularity of a violent passion, some graceful action, a smile, a glance of an eye, a disdainful look, and a look of gravity. Dryden's Dufresncy.
 A snatch of sight; a quick view.
 The ample mind takes a survey of several objects with one glance. Watts's Improvement of the Mind.

Glass (adjective)
Glass. adj. Vitreous; made of glass.
             Get thee glass eyes;  And, like a scurvy politician, seem To see the things thou do'st not. Shakesp. King Lear.
Glass bottles are more fit for this second fining than those of wood. Mortimer's Husbandry.

Glass (noun)
Glass. n.s. [ᵹlæꞅ, Saxon; glas, Dutch, as Pezon imagines from glâs, British, green. In Erse it is called klânn , and this primarily signifies clean or clear, being so denominated from its transparency.

 An artificial substance made by fusing fixed salts and flint or sand together, with a vehement fire.
 The word glass cometh from the Belgick and High Dutch: glass, from the verb glansen, which signifies amongst them to shine; or perhaps from glacies in the Latin, which is ice, whose colour it resembles. Peacham on Drawing.
 Glass is thought so compact and firm a body that it is indestructible by art or nature, and is also of so close a texture that the subtlest chymical spirits cannot pervade it. Boyle.
 Show'rs of granadoes rain, by sudden burst Disploding murd'rous bowels, fragments of steel And stones, and glass and nitrous grain adust. Phillips.
 A glass vessel of any kind.
                  I'll see no more; And yet the eighth appears, who bears a glass Which shews me many more. Shakespeare's Macbeth.
 A looking-glass; a mirrour.
 He was the mark and glass, copy and book, That fashion'd others. Shakespeare's Henry IV. p. ii.
 He spreads his subtile nets from sight, With twinkling glasses, to betray The larks that in the meshes light. Dryden's Horace.
 An Hour Glass. A glass used in measuring time by the flux of sand.
                    Were my wife's liver Infected as her life, she would not live The running of one glass. Shakes. Winter's Tale.
 A cup of glass used to drink in.
          To this last costly treaty, That swallow'd so much treasure, and like a glass Did break i' th' rinsing. Shakespeare's Henry VIII.
                      When thy heart Dilates with fervent joys and eager soul Prompts to pursue the sparkling glass, besure 'Tis time to shun it. Phillips.
 The quantity of wine usually contained in a glass; a draught.
  While a man thinks one glass more will not make him drunk, that one glass hath disabled him from well discerning his present condition. Taylor's Rule of living holy.
  The first glass may pass for health, the second for good-humour, the third for our friends; but the fourth is for our enemies. Temple.
 A perspective glass.
  Like those who have surveyed the moon by glasses, I can only tell of a new and shining world above us; but not relate the riches and glories of the place. Dryden.

Glass (verb)


Gleek (noun)
Gleek. n.s. [ʒliʒʒe, Saxon.] Musick; or musician.
 What will you give us? —— No money, but the gleek: I will give you the minstrel. Shakesp. Romeo and Juliet.

Gleek (verb)
To Gleek. v.a. [ʒliʒman, in Saxon, is a mimick or a droll.]

 To sneer; to gibe; to droll upon.
 I can gleek upon occasion. Shakesp. Mids. Night's Dream.
 I have seen you gleeking or galling at this gentleman twice or thrice. Shakespeare's Henry V.
 In Scotland it is still retained, and signifies to fool or spend time idly, with something of mimickry or drollery.

Glory (noun)
Glóry. n.s. [gloire, French; gloria, Latin. Among the old poets it was used sometimes as one syllable, glore.]

 Praise paid in adoration.
Praise paid in adoration. Luke ii. 14.
 The felicity of heaven prepared for those that please God.
Thou shalt guide me with thy counsel, and afterwards receive me to thy glory. Psal. lxxiii. 24.
Then enter into glory, and resumeHis seat at God's right hand, exalted highAbove all names in heav'n. Milton's Paradise Lost.
 Honour; praise; fame; renown; celebrity.
Think it no glory to swell in tyranny. Sidney.
Glory is like a circle in the water,Which never ceaseth to enlarge itself,'Till by broad spreading it disperse to nought. Shak. H. VI.
And with that word and warning soon was dight,Each soldier longing for near coming glory. Fairfax, b. i.
Can we imagine that either the ambition of princes, or interest, or gain in private persons, or curiosity and the desire of knowledge, or the glory of discoveries, could ever move them in that endless time to try their fortunes upon the sea. Burnet.
 Splendour; magnificence.
Solomon, in all his glory, was not arrayed like one of these. Matt. iv. 29.
Treated so ill, chas'd from your throne,Returning, you adorn the town;And with a brave revenge do showTheir glory went and came with you. Waller.
Aristotle says, that should a man under ground converse with works of art, and be afterwards brought up into the open day, and see the several glories of the heaven and earth, he would pronounce them the works of God. Addison's Spectator.
 Lustre; brightness.
Now sleeping flocks on their soft fleeces lie;The moon, serene in glory, mounts the sky. Pope's Winter.
From opening skies may streaming glories shine,And saints embrace thee with a love like mine. Pope.
 A circle of rays which surrounds the heads of saints in picture.
It is not a converting but a crowning grace; such an one as irradiates, and puts a circle of glory about the head of him upon whom it descends. South's Sermons.
A smile plays with a surprising agreeableness in the eye, breaks out with the brightest distinction, and fits like a glory upon the countenance. Collier of the Aspect.
 Pride; boastfulness; arrogance.
By the vain glory of men they entered into the world, and therefore shall they come shortly to an end. Wisd. xiv. 14.
 Generous pride.
The success of those wars was too notable to be unknown to your ears, to which all worthy fame hath glory to come unto. Sidney, b. ii.

Glory (verb)
To Glory. v.n. [glorior, Latin.] To boast in; to be proud of.
With like judgment glorying when he had happened to do a thing well, as when he had performed some notable mischief. Sidney, b. ii.
They were wont, in the pride of their own proceedings, to glory, that whereas Luther did but blow away the roof, and Zuinglius batter but the walls of popish superstition, the last and hardest work of all remained, which was to raze up the very ground and foundation of popery. Hooker, b. v. s. 42.
Let them look they glory not in mischief,Nor build their evils on the graves of great men;For then my guiltless blood must cry against them. Shakesp.
Your glorying is not good. 1 Cor. v. 6.
            Thou hast seen mount Atlas,While storms and tempests thunder on its brow,And oceans break their billows at its feet,It stands unmov'd, and glories in its height. Addis. Cato.
This title is what I most glory in, and what most effectually calls to my mind the happiness of that government under which I live. Addison's Freeholder, № 1.
If others may glory in their birth, why may not we, whose parents were called by God to attend on him at his altar? Atter.
No one is out of the reach of misfortune; no one therefore should glory in his prosperity. Clarissa.

Go
To Go. v.n. pret. I went; I have gone. [ʒan, Saxon. This was probably changed to gone, or gang, then contracted to go.]

 To walk; to move step by step.
                  You know that loveWill creep in service where it cannot go. Shakespeare.
After some months those muscles become callous; and, having yielded to the extension, the patient makes shift to go upon it, though lamely. Wiseman's Surgery.
 To move; not stand still.
Rise, let us be going. Mat. xxvi. 46.
 To walk solemnly.
If there be cause for the church to go forth in solemn procession, his whole family have such business come upon them that no one can be spared. Hooker, b. v. s. 41.
 To walk leisurely, not run.
And must I go to him?— Thou must run to him; for thou hast staid so long, that going will scarce serve the turn. Shakespeare.
 To travel; to journey a-foot.
I will only go through on my feet. Num. xx. 19.
And whosoever shall compel thee to go a mile, go with him twain. Mat. v. 41.
                    From them I go,This uncouth errand sole. Milton.
 To proceed; to make a progress.
Thus others we with defamation wound,While they stab us; and so the jest goes round. Dryden.
 To remove from place to place.
                      I am in bloodStept in so far, that, should I wade no more,Returning were as tedious as go o'er. Shakesp. Macbeth.
 To depart from a place; to move from a place; the opposite of to come.
I hope it be not gone, to tell my lordThat I kiss aught but him. Shakespeare's Cymbeline.
              At once, good-night:Stand not upon the order of your going,But go at once. Shakespeare's Macbeth.
Ye shall not go forth hence. Gen. xlii. 15.
And when she had so said she went her way. Jo. xi. 28.
I will let you go, that ye may sacrifice; only you shall not go very far away. Ex. viii. 28.
Colchester oysters are put into pits, where the sea goeth and cometh. Bacon's Natural History.
                  A young tall squireDid from the camp at first before him go. Cowley's Davideis.
Then I concur to let him go for Greece,And with our Egypt fairly rid of him. Dryden's Cleomenes.
Go first the master of thy herds to find,True to his charge, a loyal swain and kind. Pope's Odyssey.
 To move or pass in any manner, or to any end.
Though the vicar be bad, or the parson be evil,Go not for thy tything thyself to the devil. Tuss. Husbandry.
She may go to bed when she list; all is as she will. Shakesp.
You did wish that I would make her turn;Sir, she can turn and turn, and yet go on. Shakes. Othello.
I am glad to see your lordship abroad: I heard say your lordship was sick: I hope your lordship goes abroad by advice. Shakespeare's Henry IV. p. ii.
Go to, let us go down, and there confound their language. Gen. xi. 7.
Let my Lord go amongst us. Ex. xxxiv. 9.
The mourners go about the streets. Eccl. xii. 5.
The sun shall go down over the prophets, and the day shall be dark over them. Mac. iii. 6.
Put every man his sword by his side, and go in and out from gate to gate throughout the camp. Ex. xxxii. 27.
The sun, which once did shine alone,Hung down his head, and wish'd for night,When he beheld twelve suns for oneGoing about the world, and giving light. Herbert.
This seen, the rest at awful distance stood,As if they had been there as servants set,To stay, or to go on, as he thought good,And not pursue, but wait on his retreat. Dryd. Ann. Mir.
Not turning them going, 'till you have given them all the satisfaction they are capable of, and so leading them by your answers into farther questions. Locke.
History only acquaints us that his fleet went up the Elbe, he having carried his arms as far as the banks of that river. Arbuthnot on Coins.
The last advice I give you relates to your behaviour when you are going to be hanged, which, either for robbing your master, for housebreaking, or going upon the highway, may very probably be your lot. Swift's Directions to the Footman.
Those who come for gold will go off with pewter and brass, rather than return empty. Swift.
 To pass in company with others.
Thou shalt again be adorned with thy tabrets, and shalt go forth in the dances of them that make merry. Jer. xxxi. 4.
Whatever remains in story of Atlas, or his kingdom of old, is so obscured with age or fables, that it may go along with those of the Atlantick islands. Temple.
 To proceed in any course of life good or bad.
He goeth in company with the workers of iniquity, and walketh with wicked men. Job xxxiv. 8.
And the Levites that are gone away far from me, when Israel went astray, which went astray away from me after their idols, they shall even bear their iniquity. Ezek. xliv. 10.
 To proceed in mental operations.
If I had unwarily too far engaged myself for the present publishing it, truely I should have kept it by me 'till I had once again gone over it. Digby on the Soul, Dedication.
Thus I have gone through the speculative consideration of the Divine Providence. Hale's Origin of Mankind.
I hope, by going over all these particulars, you may receive some tolerable satisfaction about this great subject. South.
If we go over the laws of Christianity, we shall find that, excepting a very few particulars, they enjoin the very same things, only they have made our duty more clear and certain. Tillotson, Sermon 6.
In their primary qualities we can go but a very little way. Locke.
I go over some parts of this argument again, and enlarge a little more upon them. Locke.
They are not able all their life-time to reckon, or regularly go over any moderate series of numbers. Locke.
 To take any road.
I will go along by the highway; I will neither turn to the right hand, nor to the left. Deutr. ii. 27.
Who shall bemoan thee? Or who shall go aside to ask how thou doest? Jer. xv. 5.
        His horses go aboutAlmost a mile. Shakespeare's Macbeth.
I have endeavoured to escape into the ease and freedom of a private scene, where a man may go his own way and his own pace. Temple.
 To march in a hostile or warlike manner.
You were advis'd his flesh was capableOf wounds and scars, and that his forward spiritWould lift where most trade of danger rang'd;Yet did you say go forth. Shakespeare's Henry IV. p. i:
We be not able to go up against the people; for they are stronger than we. Numb. xiii. 31.
Let us go down after the Philistines by night, and spoil them until the morning light. 1 Sa. xiv. 36.
Thou art able to go against this Philistine to fight with him. 1 Sa. xvii. 33.
The remnant of Jacob shall be among the Gentiles as a lion among the beasts of the forest; who, if he go through, both treadeth down and teareth in pieces, and none can deliver. Mic. v. 8.
 To change state or opinion for better or worse.
We will not hearken to the king's words to go from our religion. 1 Mac. ii. 22.
The regard of the publick state, in so great a danger, made all those goodly things, which went so to wreck, to be lightly accounted of, in comparison of their lives and liberty. Knolles.
They become secretly discontent, and look upon men and matters with an evil eye; and are best pleased when things go backward, which is the worst property of a servant of a prince or state. Bacon, Essay 37.
All goes to ruin, they themselves contriveTo rob the honey, and subvert the hive. Dryd. Virg. Georg.
Landed men, as well as others, by their providence and good husbandry, accommodating their expences to their income, keep themselves from going backwards in the world. Locke.
Cato, we all go into your opinion. Addison's Cato.
 To apply one's self.
Seeing himself confronted by so many, like a resolute orator, he went not to denial, but to justify his cruel falsehood. Sidney.
Because this atheist goes mechanically to work, he will not offer to affirm that all the parts of the embryon could, according to his explication, be formed at a time. Bentley's Sermons.
 To have recourse to.
Dare any of you, having a matter against another, go to law before the unjust, and not before the saints? 1 Cor. vi. 1.
 To be about to do.
So extraordinary an example, in so degenerate an age, deserves for the rarity, and, I was going to say, for the incredibility of it, the attestation of all that knew him, and considered his worth. Locke.
 To shift; to pass life not quite well.
Every goldsmith, eager to engross to himself as much as he could, was content to pay high for it, rather than go without. Locke.
Cloaths they must have; but if they speak for this stuff, or that colour, they should be sure to go without it. Locke.
 To decline; to tend towards death or ruin.
He is far gone, and, truly, in my youth,I suffer'd much extremity for love,Very near this. Shakespeare's Hamlet.
 To be in party or design.
They with the vanquish'd prince and party go,And leave their temples empty to the foe. Dryden.
 To escape.
Timotheus himself fell into the hands of Dositheus and Sosipater, whom he besought with much craft to let him go with his life. 2 Mac. xii. 24.
 To tend to any act.
There be some women, Silvius, had they mark'd himIn parcels as I did, would have gone nearTo fall in love with him. Shakesp. As you like it.
 To be uttered.
His disciples personally appeared among them, and ascertained the report which had gone abroad concerning a life so full of miracles. Addison on the Christian Religion.
 To be talked of; to be known.
It has the greatest town in the island that goes under the name of Ano-Caprea, and is in several places covered with a very fruitful soil. Addison's Remarks on Italy.
 To pass; to be received.
Because a fellow of my acquaintance set forth her praises in verse, I will only repeat them, and spare my own tongue, since she goes for a woman. Sidney.
And the man went among men for an old man in the days of Saul. 1 Sa. xvii. 12.
A kind imagination makes a bold man have vigour and enterprize in his air and motion: it stamps value upon his face, and tells the people he is to go for so much. Collier.
Clipping should be finally stopped, and the money which remains should go according to its true value. Locke.
 To move by mechanism.
This pope is decrepid, and the bell goeth for him: take order that, when he is dead, there be chosen a pope of fresh years. Bacon's Holy War.
Clocks will go as they are set; but man,Irregular man's never constant, never certain. Otway.
'Tis with our judgments as our watches, noneGo just alike, yet each believes his own. Pope's Ess. on Crit.
 To be in motion from whatever cause.
The weyward sisters, hand in hand,Posters of the sea and land,Thus do go about, about. Shakespeare's Macbeth.
Clipt and washed money goes about, when the entire and weighty lies hoarded up. Waller.
 To move in any direction.
Doctor, he is a curer of souls, and you a curer of bodies: if you should fight, you go against the hair of your professions. Shakespeare's Merry Wives of Windsor.
Thou trustest upon the staff of this bruised reed, even upon Egypt; on which, if a man lean, it will go into his hand and pierce it. 2 Kings xviii. 21.
Shall the shadow go forward ten degrees, or go back ten degrees? 2 Kings xx. 9.
 To flow; to pass; to have a course.
The god I am, whose yellow water flowsAround these fields, and fattens as it goes,Tyber my name. Dryden's Æn.
 To have any tendency.
                    Athenians, knowAgainst right reason all your counsels go;This is not fair, nor profitable that,Nor t'other question proper for debate. Dryden's Pers.
 To be in a state of compact or partnership.
As a lion was bestriding an ox that he had newly plucked down, a robber passing by cried out to him, half shares: you should go your snip, says the lion, if you were not so forward to be your own carver. L'Estrange.
There was a hunting match agreed upon betwixt a lion, an ass, and a fox, and they were to go equal shares in the booty. L'Estrange.
 To be regulated by any method; to proceed upon principles.
Where the multitude beareth sway, laws that shall tend to the preservation of that state must make common smaller offices to go by lot, for fear of strife and divisions likely to arise. Hook.
We are to go by another measure. Sprat's Sermons.
The principles I there went on, I see no reason to alter. Loc.
The reasons that they went upon were very specious and probable. Bentley's Sermons.
 To be pregnant.
                Great bellied women,That had not half a week to go. Shakesp. Henry VIII.
                    The fruit she goes with,I pray that it good time and life may find. Shakes. H. VIII.
Of living creatures some are a longer time in the womb, and some shorter: women go commonly nine months, the cow and ewe about six months. Bacon's Nat. History.
Some do go with their young the sixth part of a year, or two over or under, that is, about six or nine weeks; and the whelps of these see not 'till twelve days. Brown.
And now with second hopes she goes,And calls Lucina to her throws. Milton.
 To pass; not to remain.
She began to afflict him, and his strength went from him. Judg. xvi. 19.
When our merchants have brought them, if our commodities will not be enough, our money must go to pay for them. Locke.
 To pass; not to be retained.
                Then he lets me go,And, with his head over his shoulder turn'd,He seem'd to find his way without his eyes. Shakes. Hamlet.
Let go the hand of that arch heretick. Shakes. K. John.
 To be expended.
Scholars are close and frugal of their words, and not willing to let any go for ornament, if they will not serve for use. Felton on the Classicks.
 To be in order of time or place.
We must enquire farther what is the connexion of that sentence with those that go before it, and those which follow it. Watts's Logick.
 To reach or be extended to any degree.
Can another man perceive that I am conscious of any thing, when I perceive it not myself? No man's knowledge here can go beyond his experience. Locke.
 To extend to consequences.
It is not one master that either directs or takes notice of these: it goes a great way barely to permit them. L'Estrange.
 To reach by effects.
Considering the cheapness, so much money might go farther than a sum ten times greater could do now. Wilkins.
 To extend in meaning.
His amorous expressions go no further than virtue may allow. Dryden's Ovid, Preface.
 To spread; to be dispersed; to reach farther.
Whose flesh, torn off by lumps, the rav'nous foeIn morsels cut, to make it farther go. Tate's Juven. Sat.
 To have influence; to be of weight.
I had another reason to decline it, that ever uses to go far with me upon all new inventions or experiments; which is, that the best trial of them is by time, and observing whether they live or no. Temple.
'Tis a rule that goes a great way in the government of a sober man's life, not to put any thing to hazard that may be secured by industry, consideration, or circumspection. L'Estr.
Whatever appears against their prevailing vice goes for nothing, being either not applied, or passing for libel and slander. Swift.
 To be rated one with another; to be considered with regard to greater or less worth.
I think, as the world goes, he was a good sort of man enough. Arbuthnot.
 To contribute; to conduce; to concur.
The medicines which go to the ointments are so strong, that, if they were used inwards, they would kill those that use them. Bacon's Natural History.
More parts of the greater wheels go to the making one part of their lines. Glanv. Sceps. c. 8.
There goes a great many qualifications to the compleating this relation: there is no small share of honour and conscience and sufficiency required. Collier of Friendship.
I had some thoughts of giving the sex their revenge, by laying together the many vicious characters that prevail in the male world, and shewing the different ingredients that go to the making up of such different humours and constitutions. Addison's Spectator, № 211.
Something better and greater than high birth and quality must go toward acquiring those demonstrations of publick esteem and love. Swift to Pope.
 To fall out, or terminate; to succeed.
Your strong possession much more than your right,Or else it must go wrong with you and me. Shakes. K. John.
Howe'er the business goes, you have made faultI' th' boldness of your speech. Shakesp. Winter's Tale.
I will send to thy father, and they shall declare unto him how things go with thee. Tob. x. 8.
In many armies, if the matter should be tried by duel between two champions, the victory should go on the one side; and yet, if it be tried by the gross, it would go on the other side. Bacon's Collection of Good and Evil.
It has been the constant observation of all, that if a minister had a cause depending in the court, it was ten to one but it went against him. South's Sermons.
At the time of the prince's landing, the father, easily foreseeing how things would go, went over, like many others, to the prince. Swift.
Whether the cause goes for me or against me, you must pay me the reward. Watt's Logick.
 To be in any state.  This sense is impersonal.
It shall go ill with him that is left in his tabernacle. Job xx.
He called his name Beriah, because it went evil with his house. 1 Chr. vii. 23.
 To proceed in train or consequence.
              How goes the night, boy?— The moon is down: I have not heard the clock;And she goes down at twelve.I take't 'tis later, sir. Shakespeare's Macbeth.
                            I had hope,When violence was ceas'd, and war on earth,All would have then gone well. Milton.
Duration in itself is to be considered as going on in one constant, equal, uniform course. Locke.
 To Go about. To attempt; to endeavour; to set one's self to any business.
                      O dear father,It is thy business that I go about. Shakespeare's King Lear.
I lost him; but so found, as well I sawHe could not lose himself, but went aboutHis father's business. Paradise Regain'd, b. ii.
Which answer exceedingly united the vulgar minds to them, who concurred only with them as they saw them like to prevail in what they went about. Clarendon.
Some men, from a false persuasion that they cannot reform their lives, break off their ill customs, and root out their old vicious habits, never so much as attempt, endeavour, or go about it. South's Sermons.
Either my book is plainly enough written to be rightly understood by those who peruse it with attention and indifferency, or else I have writ mine so obscurely that it is in vain to go about to mend it. Locke.
They never go about, as in former times, to hide or palliate their vices; but expose them freely to view. Swift.
 To Go aside. To err; to deviate from the right.
If any man's wife go aside, and commit a trespass against him. Numb. v. 12.
 To Go between. To interpose; to moderate between two.
I did go between them, as I said; but more than that, he loved her; for, indeed, he was mad for her. Shakespeare.
 To Go by. To pass away unnoticed.
Do not you come your tardy son to chide,That laps'd in time and passion, lets go byTh' important acting of your dread command? Sh. Hamlet.
So much the more our carver's excellent,Which lets go by some sixteen years, and makes herAs she liv'd now. Shakespeare's Winter's Tale.
What's that to us? The time goes by; away. Shakespeare.
 To Go by. To find or get in the conclusion.
In argument with men a woman everGoes by the worse, whatever be her cause. Milt. Agonistes.
He's sure to go by the worst that contends with an adversary that is too mighty for him. L'Estrange.
 To Go by. To observe as a rule.
'Tis not to be supposed, that by searching one can positively judge of the size and form of a stone; and indeed the frequency of the fits, and violence of the symptoms, are a better rule to go by. Sharp's Surgery.
  To Go down. To be swallowed; to be received, not rejected.
Nothing so ridiculous, nothing so impossible, but it goes down whole with him for truth and earnest. L'Estrange.
Folly will not easily go down in its own natural form with discerning judges. Dryden's Aurengzebe, Preface.
If he be hungry, bread will go down. Locke.
Ministers are so wise to leave their proceedings to be accounted for by reasoners at a distance, who often mould them into the systems that do not only go down very well in the coffeehouse, but are supplies for pamphlets in the present age. Swift on the present State of Affairs.
 To Go in and out. To do the business of life.
The Lord shall preserve thy going out and thy coming in. Ps.
 To Go in and out. To be at liberty.
He shall go in and out, and find pasture. John x. 9.
 To Go off. To die; to go out of life; to decease.
I would the friends we miss were safe arriv'd:Some must go off; and yet, by these I see,So great a day as this is cheaply bought. Shakesp. Macbeth.
In this manner he went off, not like a man that departed out of life, but one that returned to his abode. Tatler, № 86.
 To Go off. To depart from a post.
The leaders having charge from you to stand,Will not go off until they hear you speak. Shakesp. H. IV.
 To Go on. To make attack.
                                  Bold Cethegus,Whose valour I have turn'd into his poison,And prais'd so to daring, as he wouldGo on upon the gods. Ben. Johnson's Catiline.
 To Go on. To proceed.
He found it a great war to keep that peace, but was fain to go on in his story. Sidney, b. ii.
He that desires only that the work of God and religion shall go on, is pleased with it, whoever is the instrument. Taylor.
I have escaped many threats of ill fits by these motions: if they go on, the only poltice I have dealt with is wool from the belly of a fat sheep. Temple.
To look upon the soul as going on from strength to strength, to consider that she is to shine for ever with new accessions of glory, and brighten to all eternity, is agreeable. Addis. Spect.
Go on chearfully in the glorious course you have undertaken. Addison's Spectator, № 164.
Copious bleeding is the most effectual remedy in the beginning of the disease; but when the expectoration goes on successfully, not so proper, because it sometimes suppresseth it. Arbuthnot on Diet.
I have already handled some abuses during the late management, and in convenient time shall go on with the rest. Swift.
When we had found that design impracticable, we should not have gone on in so expensive a management of it. Swift.
Many clergymen write in so diminutive a manner, with such frequent blots and interlineations, that they are hardly able to go on without perpetual hesitations, or extraordinary expletives. Swift.
I wish you health to go on with that noble work. Berkley.
 To Go over. To revolt; to betake himself to another party.
In the change of religion, men of ordinary understandings don't so much consider the principles as the practice of those to whom they go over. Addison on Italy.
Power which, according to the old maxim, was used to follow, is now gone over to money. Swift.
 To Go out. To go upon any expedition.
You need not have pricked me: there are other men fitter to go out than I. Shakespeare's Henry IV. p. ii.
 To Go out. To be extinguished.
Think'st thou the fiery fever will go out,With titles blown from adulation? Shakespeare's Henry V.
Spirit of wine burned 'till it go out of itself, will burn no more. Bacon's Natural History.
The care of a state, or an army, ought to be as constant as the chymist's fire, to make any great production; and if it goes out for an hour, perhaps the whole operation fails. Temp.
The morning, as mistaken, turns about;And all her early fires again go out. Dryden's Aurengzebe.
Let the acquaintance be decently buried, and the flame rather go out than be smothered. Collier of Friendship.
My blood runs cold, my heart forgets to heave,And life itself goes out at thy displeasure. Addison's Cato.
And at her felt approach and secret might,Art after art goes out, and all is night. Pope's Dunciad, b. iii.
 To Go through. To perform throughly; to execute.
Finding Pyrocles every way able to go through with that kind of life, he was as desirous for his sake as for his own to enter into it. Sidney, b. ii.
If you can as well go through with the statute laws of that land, I will think you have not lost all your time there. Spenser.
Kings ought not to suffer their council to go through with the resolution and direction, as if it depended on them, but take the matter back into their own hands. Bacon, Essay 21.
He much feared the earl of Antrim had not steadiness of mind enough to go through with such an undertaking. Clarend.
The amazing difficulty and greatness of his account will rather terrify than inform him, and keep him from setting heartily about such a task, as he despairs ever to go through with it. South's Sermons.
The powers in Germany are borrowing money, in order to go through their part of the expence. Addison on the War.
 To Go through. To suffer; to undergo.
I tell thee that it is absolutely necessary for the common good that thou shouldst go through this operation. Arbuthnot.
 The senses of this word are very indistinct: its general notion is motion or progression.

Go-cart
Go-cart. n.s. [go and cart.] A machine in which children are inclosed to teach them to walk, and which they push forward without danger of falling.
             Young children, who are try'd in Go-carts, to keep their steps from sliding, When members knit, and legs grow stronger, Make use of such machine no longer. Prior.

Goad (noun)
Goad. n.s. [ʒad, Saxon.] A pointed instrument with which oxen are driven forward.
Oft in his harden'd hand a goad he bears. Pope.

Goad (verb)
To Goad. v.a. [from the noun.]

 To prick or drive with a goad.

 To incite; to stimulate; to instigate; to drive forward.
                        Most dangerousIs that temptation, that doth goad us onTo sin in loving virtue. Shakesp. Measure for Measure.
        Goaded with most sharp occasions,Which lay nice manners by, I put you toThe use of your own virtues. Shak. All's well that ends well.
Of all that breathes the various progeny,Stung with delight, is goaded on by thee. Dryden's Lucret.

Gold
Gold. n.s. [ʒold, Saxon; golud, riches, Welsh.  It is called gold in our English tongue either of geel, as Scaliger says, which is in Dutch to shine; or of another Dutch word, which is gelten, and signifies in Latin valere, in English to be of price or value: hence cometh their ordinary word gelt, for money.  Peacham on Drawing.]

 Gold is the heaviest, the most dense, the most simple, the most ductile, and most fixed of all bodies; not to be injured either by air or fire, and seeming incorruptible.  It is soluble by means of sea-salt; but is injured by no other salt, and is most easily of all metals amalgamated with silver.  Gold is frequently found native, and very rarely in a state of ore.  It never constitutes a peculiar ore, but is found most frequently among ore of silver.  Native gold is seldom found pure, but has almost constantly silver with it, and very frequently copper.  Gold dust, or native gold, in small masses, is mixed among the sand of rivers in many parts of the world.  It is found, in the greatest abundance, bedded in masses of hard stone, often at the depth of a hundred and fifty fathoms in the mines of Peru.  Pure gold is so fixed, that Boerhaave informs us of an ounce of it set in the eye of a glass furnace for two months, without losing a single grain. Hill on Fossils.
Gold hath these natures: greatness of weight, closeness of parts, fixation, pliantness or softness, immunity from rust, and the colour or tincture of yellow. Bacon's Nat. History.
Ah! Buckingham, now do I ply the touch,To try if thou be current gold indeed. Shakes. Rich. III.
We commonly take shape and colour for so presumptive ideas of several species, that, in a good picture, we readily say this is gold, and that a silver goblet, only by the different figures and colours represented to the eye by the pencil. Locke.
The gold fraught vessel, which mad tempests beat,He sees now vainly make to his retreat. Dryd. Tyran. Love.
 Money.
For me, the gold of France did not seduce,Although I did admit it as a motiveThe sooner to effect what I intended. Shakesp. Henry V.
Thou, that so stoutly hast resisted me,Give me thy gold, if thou hast any gold;For I have bought it with an hundred blows. Shakes. H. VI.
If I want gold, steal but a beggar's dog,And give it Timon, why, the dog coins gold. Shakespeare.
 It is used for any thing pleasing or valuable.  So among the ancients χρυσῆ ἀφροδίτη; and animamq; moresque aureos educit in astra. Horace.
The king's a bawcock, and a heart of gold,A lad of life, an imp of fame. Shakespeare's Henry V.

Gome
Gome. n.s. The black and oily grease of a cart-wheel. Bailey.

Gomphosis
Gómphosis. n.s. A particular form of articulation.
Gomphosis is the connexion of a tooth to its socket. Wisem.

Gondola
Góndola. n.s. [gondole, French.] A boat much used in Venice; a small boat.
                     He saw did swim Along the shore, as swift as glance of eye, A little gondelay, bedecked trim With boughs and arbours woven cunningly. Fairy Queen.
In a gondola were seen together Lorenzo and his amorous Jessica. Shakespeare's Merchant of Venice.
         As with gondola's and men, his Good excellence the duke of Venice Sails out, and gives the gulph a ring. Prior.

Gonorrhoea
Gonorrhoéa. n.s. [γόνος and ῥεω.] A morbid running of venereal hurts.
 Rauty mummy or stone mummy grows on the tops of high rocks: they powder and boil it in milk, and then give it to stop gonorrhœas. Woodward on Fossils.

Goose
Goose. n.s. plural geese. [ᵹoꞅ, Saxon; goes, Dutch; gawe, Erse, sing. gewey, plural.]

 A large waterfowl proverbially noted, I know not why, for foolishness.
                      Thou cream-faced lown, Where got'st thou that goose look? Shakesp. Macbeth.
 Since I pluckt geese, play'd truant, and whipt top, I knew not what 'twas to be beaten 'till lately. Shakespeare.
 Smile you my speeches, as I were a fool? Goose, if I had you upon Sarum plain, I'd drive ye cackling home to Comelot. Shakes. King Lear.
 Birds most easy to be drawn are waterfowl; as the goose and swan. Peacham on Drawing.
 Nor watchful dogs, nor the more wakeful geese, Disturb with nightly noise the sacred peace. Dryd. Fables.
 A taylor's smoothing iron.
 Come in, taylor: here you may roast your goose. Shakesp.

Gore (noun)
Gore. n.s. [ʒore, Saxon; gôr, Welsh, sanious matter.]

 Blood.
                A griesly wound, From which forth gush'd a stream of gore blood thick, And into a deep sanguine dy'd the grassy ground. F. Queen.
 Glutting his father's eyes with guiltless gore. Dryden's Æn.
 Blood clotted or congealed.
                 The bloody fact Will be aveng'd; though here thou see him die, Rolling in dust and gore. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. xi.
 His horrid beard and knotted tresses stood Still with his gore, and all his wounds ran blood. Denham.

Gore (verb)
To Gore. v.a. [ʒeberian, Saxon.]

 To stab; to pierce.
 Oh, let no noble eye profane a tear For me, if I be gor'd with Mowbray's spear. Shakes. R. II.
 No weaker lion's by a stronger slain; Nor from his larger tusks the forest boar Commission takes his brother swine to gore. Tate's Juven.
 For arms his men long pikes and jav'lins bore, And poles with pointed steel their foes in battle gore. Dryd.
 To pierce with a horn.
  Some toss'd, some gor'd, some trampling down he kill'd. Dryden's Preface to the Conquest of Granada.
         He idly butting, feigns His rival gor'd in every knotty trunk.. Thomson's Spring.

Gorgeous
Go'rgeous. adj. [gorgias, old French. Skinner.] Fine; splendid; glittering in various colours; showy; magnificent.
             O, that deceit should dwell In such a gorgeous palace! Shakes. Romeo and Juliet.
As full of spirit as the month of May, And gorgeous as the sun at Midsummer. Shakesp, Hen. IV.
He bad them look upon themselves and upon their enemies, themselves dreadful, their enemies gorgeous and brave. Hayw.
The gorgeous East, with richest hand, Pours on her kings barbaric, pearl and gold. Milton.
With gorgeous wings, the marks of sov'reign sway, The two contending princes make their way. Dryd. Virgil.

Gorgon
Górgon. n.s. [γοργὼ.] A monster with snaky hairs, of which the sight turned beholders to stone; any thing ugly or horrid.
 Gorgons and hydras, and chimera's dire. Milton.
 Why did'st thou not encounter man for man, And try the virtue of that gorgon face To stare me into stature. Dryden.

Gormand
Górmand. n.s. [gourmand, French.] A greedy eater; a ravenous luxurious feeder.

Gormandize
To Górmandize. v.n. [from gormand.] To eat greedily; to feed ravenously.

Gormandizer
Górmandizer. n.s. [from the verb.] A voracious eater.

Gorse
Gorse. n.s. [ʒors, Saxon.] Furz; a thick prickly shrub that bears yellow flowers in Winter.

Gory
Góry. adj. [from gore.]

 Covered with congealed blood.
 When two boars with rankling malice met, Their gory sides the fresh wounds fiercely fret. Spenser.
 Why do'st thou shake thy gory locks at me? Thou can'st not say I did it. Shakesp. Macbeth.
 Bloody; murtherous; fatal. Not in use.
 The obligation of our blood forbids A gory emulation 'twixt us twain. Shak. Troil. and Cressida.

Gradient
Grádient. adj. [gradiens, Latin.] Walking; moving by steps.
 Amongst those gradient automata, that iron spider is especially remarkable, which, being but of an ordinary bigness, did creep up and down as if it had been alive. Wilkins.

Gramineous
Gramíneous. adj. [gramineus, Latin.] Grassy. Gramineous plants are such as have a long leaf without a footstalk.

Graminivorous
Graminívorous. adj. [gramen and voro, Latin.] Grass-eating; living upon grass.
 The ancients were versed chiefly in the dissection of brutes, among which the graminivorous kind have a party-coloured choroides. Sharp's Surgery.

Grammar
Grámmar. n.s. [grammaire, French; grammatica, Latin; γραμματικὴ.]

 The science of speaking correctly; the art which teaches the relation of words to each other.
 We make a countryman dumb, whom we will not allow to speak but by the rules of grammar. Dryden's Dufresnoy.
 Men, speaking language according to the grammar rules of that language, do yet speak improperly of things. Locke.
 Propriety or justness of speech; speech according to grammar.
 Varium & mutabile semper femina, is the sharpest satire that ever was made on woman; for the adjectives are neuter, and animal must be understood to make them grammar. Dryden.
 The book that treats of the various relations of words to one another.

Grammar School
Grámmar School. n.s. A school in which the learned languages are grammatically taught.
 Thou hast most traitorously corrupted the youth of the realm in erecting a grammar school. Shakespeare's Hen. VI.
 The ordinary way of learning Latin in a grammar school I cannot encourage. Locke.

Grammaticaster
Grammaticáster. n.s. [Latin.] A mean verbal pedant; a low grammarian.
I have not vexed their language with the doubts, the remarks, and eternal triflings of the French grammaticasters. Rymer's Tragedies of the last Age.

Grand
Grand. adj. [grand, French; grandis, Latin.]

 Great; illustrious; high in power.
 God had planted, that is, made to grow the trees of life and knowledge, plants only proper and becoming the paradise and garden of so grand a Lord. Raleigh's Hist. of the World.
 Great; splendid; magnificent.
         A voice has flown To re-enflame a grand design. Young.
 Noble; sublime; lofty; conceived or expressed with great dignity.

 It is used to signify ascent or descent of consanguinity.

Grandevity
Grandévity. n.s. [from grandævus, Latin.] Great age; length of life. Dict.

Grandevous
Grandévous. adj. [grandævus, Latin.] Long lived; of great age. Dict.

Grange
Grange. n.s. [grange, French.] A farm: generally a farm with a house at a distance from neighbours.
 One, when he had got the inheritance of an unlucky old grange, would needs fell it; and, to draw buyers, proclaimed the virtues of it: nothing ever thrived on it, saith he; the trees were all blasted, the swine died of the measles, the cattle of the murrain, and the sheep of the rot; nothing was ever reared there, not a duckling or a goose. Ben. Johnson's Discov.
 At the moated grange resides this dejected Mariana. Shakes.
                 The loose unletter'd hinds, When for their teeming flocks and granges full In wanton dance they praise the bounteous Pan. Milton.
 If the church was of their own foundation, they might chuse, the incumbent being once dead, whether they would put any other therein; unless, perhaps, the said church had people belonging to it; for then they must still maintain a curate: and of this sort were their granges and priories. Ayliffe.

Great (adjective)
Great. adj. [ᵹꞃaꞇ, Saxon; groot, Dutch.]

 Large in bulk or number.
 Judas one of the twelve came, and with a great multitude with swords and staves, from the chief priests and elders of the people. Mat. xxvi. 47.
 All these cities were fenced with high walls, gates and bars, besides unwalled towns a great many. Deutr. iii. v.
 The idea of so much is positive and clear: the idea of greater is also clear, but it is but a comparative idea. Locke.
 Having any quality in a high degree.
 There were they in great fear. Ps. xiv. 5.
 This is a great paradox. Tillotson.
 Considerable in extent of duration.
 Thou hast spoken of thy servants house for a great while to come. 2 Sa. vii. 19.
 Important; weighty.
                         Many  Have broke their backs with laying manors on them, For this great journey. Shakespeare's Henry VIII.
 And though this be a great truth, if it be impartially considered, yet it is also a great paradox to men of corrupt minds and vitious practices. Tillotson, Sermon 6.
 Chief; principal.
 Hear the king's pleasure, cardinal, who commands you To render up the great seal presently. Shakes. Henry VIII.
 Of high rank; of large power.
 Such men as he be never at heart's ease, Whilst they behold a greater than themselves. Sh. Jul. Cæs.
             Of all the great, how few Are just to heaven, and to their promise true! Pope's Odyss.
 Misfortune made the throne her seat, And none could be unhappy but the great. Rowe.
                 Despise the farce of state, The sober follies of the wise and great. Pope.
 Illustious; eminent.
 O Lord, thou art great, and thy name is great in might. Jer. x. 6.
 Grand of aspect; of elevated mien.
 Such Dido was; with such becoming state, Amidst the crowd, she walks serenely great. Dryd. Virgil.
 Noble; magnanimous.
 In her every thing was goodly and stately; yet so, that it might seem that great mindedness was but the ancient-bearer to the humbleness. Sidney.
 Swelling; proud.
 Soiyman perceived that Vienna was not to be won with words, nor the defendants to be discouraged with great looks; wherefore he begun to batter the walls. Knolles.
 Familiar; much acquainted. A low word.
 Those that would not censure, or speak ill of a man immediately, will talk more boldly of those that are great with them, and thereby would their honour. Bacon, Essay 49.
 Pregnant; teeming.
                     Their bellies great With swelling vanity, bring forth deceit. Sandys.
 This fly, for most he stings in heat of day, From cattle great with young keep thou away. May's Virg.
 It is added in every step of ascending or descending consanguinity: as great grandson is the son of my grandson.
 I dare not yet affirm for the antiquity of our language, that our great-great-great grandsires tongue came out of Persia. Camden's Remains.
 What we call great-great grandfather they called fortha-fader. Camden's Remainder.
 Their holiday-cloaths go from father to son, and are seldom worn out 'till the second or third generation; so that 'tis common enough to see a countryman in the doublet and breeches of his great grandfather. Addison.
 Hard; difficult; grievous. A proverbial expression.
 It is no great matter to live lovingly with good natured and meek persons. Taylor's Devotion.

Great (noun)
Great. n.s. [from the adjective.]

 The whole; the gross; the whole in a lump.
 To let out thy harvest by great or by day, Let this by experience lead thee the way: By great will deceive thee with ling'ring it out, By day will dispatch. Tusser's Husbandry for August.
 It were behoveful, for the strength of the navy, that no ships should be builded by the great; for by daily experience they are found to be weak and imperfect. Raliegh's Essays.
 He did at length so many slain forget, And lost the tale, and took them by the great. Dryden.
 Carpenters, for uniformity, generally make them so, unless they build an house by the great, and are agreed for the sum of money. Moxon's Mech. Exer.
 I set aside one day in a week for lovers, and interpret by the great for any gentlewoman who is turned of sixty. Addison.

Green (adjective)
Green. adj. [grun, German; green, Dutch.]

 Having a colour formed commonly by compounding blue and yellow; of the colour of the leaves of trees or herbs.  The green colour is said to be most favourable to the sight.
 The general colour of plants is green, which is a colour that no flower is of: there is a greenish primrose, but it is pale, and scarce a green. Bacon's Natural History.
 Groves for ever green. Pope.
 Pale; sickly: from whence we call the maid's disease the green sickness, or chlorosis.  Like it is Sappho's χλωροτέρη πόιας.
                Was the hope drunk Wherein you drest yourself? Hath it slept since? And wakes it now to look so green and pale At what it did so freely? Shakespeare's Macbeth.
 There's never any of these demure boys come to any proof: they fall into a kind of male green sickness. Shak. Henry IV.
 'Till the green sickness and love's force betray'd To death's remorseless arms th' unhappy maid. Garth.
 Flourishing; fresh; undecayed: from trees in Spring.

 New; fresh: as, a green wound.
 The door is open, sir; there lies your way: You may be jogging while your boots are green. Shakesp.
             Griefs are green; And all thy friends, which thou must make thy friends, Have but their stings and teeth newly ta'en out. Sh. H. IV.
             In a vault, Where bloody Tybalt, yet but green in earth, Lies festering in his blood. Shakes. Romeo and Juliet.
 A man that studieth revenge keeps his own wounds green, which otherwise would heal and do well. Bacon, Essay 4.
 Not dry.
 If a spark of error have thus far prevailed, falling even where the wood was green, and farthest off from any inclination unto furious attempts; must not the peril thereof be greater in men, whose minds are of themselves as dry fewel, apt beforehand unto tumults? Hooker, Dedication.
 Of fragility the cause is an impotency to be extended, and therefore stone is more fragil than metal, and so dry wood is more fragil than green. Bacon's Natural History.
 If you but consider a piece of green wood burning in a chimney, you will readily discern, in the disbanded parts of it, the four elements. Boyle.
 The green do often heat the ripe, and the ripe, so heated, give fire to the green. Mortimer's Husbandry.
 Not roasted; half raw.
 Under this head we may rank those words which signify different ideas, by a sort of an unaccountable far-fetched analogy, or distant resemblance, that fancy has introduced between one thing and another; as when we say the meat is green, when it is half roasted. Watts's Logick.
 Unripe; immature; young; because fruits are green before they are ripe.
                 My sallad days, When I was green in judgment, cold in blood! Shakesp.
 O charming youth, in the first op'ning page; So many graces in so green an age. Dryden.
             You'll find a difference Between the promise of his greener days, And these he masters now. Shakesp. Henry V.
 If you would fat green geese, shut them up when they are about a month old. Mortimer's Husbandry.
 Stubble geese at Michaelmas are seenUpon the spit, next May produces green. King's Cookery.

Griffin
Gríffin.Gríffon.

n.s. [This should rather be written gryfon, or gryphon, gryps, γρὺψ; but it is generally written griffon.] A fabled animal, said to be generated between the lion and eagle, and to have the head and paws of the lion, and the wings of the eagle.


 Of all bearing among these winged creatures, the griffin is the most ancient. Peacham on Blazoning.
 Aristeus, a poet of Proconesus, affirmed, that near the one-eyed nations griffins defended the mines of gold. Brown.

Griffon
Gríffin.Gríffon.

n.s. [This should rather be written gryfon, or gryphon, gryps, γρὺψ; but it is generally written griffon.] A fabled animal, said to be generated between the lion and eagle, and to have the head and paws of the lion, and the wings of the eagle.


 Of all bearing among these winged creatures, the griffin is the most ancient. Peacham on Blazoning.
 Aristeus, a poet of Proconesus, affirmed, that near the one-eyed nations griffins defended the mines of gold. Brown.

Grubstreet
Grúbstreet. n.s. Originally the name of a street in Moorfields in London, much inhabited by writers of small histories, dictionaries, and temporary poems; whence any mean production is called grubstreet.
Χᾶιῤ Ιθακὴ μετ᾽ ἄεθλα, μετ᾽ ἄλγεα πικρὰ Ἀσπασίως τέον οὗδας ἱκάνομαι.
The first part, though calculated only for the meridian of grubstreet, was yet taken notice of by the better sort. Arbuthn.
 I'd sooner ballads write, and grubstreet lays. Gay.

Grudge (verb active)


Grutch (verb)
To Grutch. v.n. [corrupted for the sake of rhyme from grudge.] To envy; to repine; to be discontented.
 The poor at the enclosure doth grutch,Because of abuses that fall, Lest some men should have but too much, And some again nothing at all. Tusser's Husbandry.
 But what we're born for we must bear, Our frail condition it is such, That what to all may happen here, If't chance to me, I must not grutch. Ben. Johnson.

Gry
Gry. n.s. [γρὺ.] Any thing of little value: as, the paring of the nails. Dict.

Guard (noun)


Guard (verb active)


Guard (verb neuter)
To Guard. v.n. To be in a state of caution or defence.
There are other nice cases, in which a man must guard, if he intends to keep fair with the world, and turn the penny. Collier on Popularity.
To guard against such mistakes, it is necessary to acquaint ourselves with little words. Watts's Logick.

Guess (noun)
Guess n.s. [from the verb.] Conjecture; judgment without any positive or certain grounds.
The enemy's in view; draw up your powers:Hard is the guess of their true strength and forces. Shakesp.
             A poet must confessHis art's like physick, but a happy guess. Dryden.
It is a wrong way of proceeding to venture a greater good for a less, upon uncertain guesses, before a due examination. Locke.
We may make some guess at the distinction of things, into those that are according to, above, and contrary to reason. Locke.
This problem yet, this offspring of a guess,Let us for once a child of truth confess. Prior.

Guess (verb active 1)
To Guess. v.a. [ghissen, Dutch.]

 To conjecture; to judge without any certain principles of judgment.
Incapable and shallow innocents!You cannot guess who caus'd your father's death. Shakesp.
Let not your ears despise my tongue for ever,Which shall possess them with the heaviest soundThat ever yet they heard.— Hum! I guess at it. Shakes. Macbeth.
He that, by reason of his swift motions, can inform himself of all places and preparations, should he not very often guess rightly of things to come, where God pleaseth not to give impediment? Raleigh's History of the World.
            There issue swarming bandsOf ambush'd men, whom, by their arms and dress,To be Taxcallan enemies I guess. Dryd. Indian Emperor.
The same author ventures to guess at the particular fate which would attend the Roman government. Swift.
Nor can imagination guess,How that ungrateful charming maidMy purest passion has betray'd. Swift.
 To conjecture rightly.
One may guess by Plato's writings, that his meaning, as to the inferiour deities, was, that they who would have them might, and they who would not, might let them alone; but that himself had a right opinion concerning the true God. Stillingfleet's Defece of Disc. on Rom. Idol.

Guess (verb active 2)
To Guess. v.a. To hit upon by accident; to determine rightly of any thing without certain direction of the judgment.
If Xerxes was able to call every common soldier by his name in his army, it may be guessed he got not this wonderful ability by learning his lessons by heart. Locke.

Guggle
Guggle. v.n. [gorgoliare, Italian.] To sound as water running with intermissions out of a narrow mouthed vessel.

Guinea
Guínea. n.s. [from Guinea, a country in Africa abounding with gold.] A gold coin valued at one and twenty shillings.
 By the word gold I must be understood to design a particular piece of matter; that is, the last guinea that was coined. Locke.

Gulosity
Gulósity. n.s. [gulosus, Latin.] Greediness; gluttony; voracity.
They are very temperate, seldom offending in ebriety, or excess of drink; nor erring in gulosity, or superfluity of meats. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iv. c. 10.

Gurgle
To Gúrgle. v.n [gorgogliare, Italian.] To fall or gush with noise, as water from a bottle.
Then when a fountain's gurgling waters play, They rush to land, and end in feasts the day. Pope.

Gybe (verb)
To Gybe. v.n. To sneer; to taunt.
              The vulgar yield an open ear,And common courtiers love to gybe and fleer. Hubb. Tale.

Gymnastically
Gymnástically. adv. [from gymnastick.] Athletically; fitly for strong exercise.
Such as with agility and vigour have not the use of either, who are not gymnastically composed, nor actively use those parts. Brown's Vulgar Errours b. iv. c. 5.

Gymnastick
Gymnástick. adj. [γυμναστικὸς; gymnastique, French.] Pertaining to athletick exercises; consisting of leaping, wrestling, running, throwing the dart, or quoit.
The Cretans wisely forbid their servants gymnasticks as well as arms; and yet your modern footmen exercise themselves daily, whilst their enervated lords are softly lolling in their chariots. Arbuthnot and Pope's Mart. Scriblerus.

Gymnick
Gýmnick. adj. [γυμνικὸς; gymnique, French.] Such as practise the athletick or gymnastick exercises.
Have they not sword-players, and ev'ry sortOf gymnick artists, wrestlers, riders, runners. Milton.

Gymnospermous
Gymnospérmous. adj. [γύμνος and σπέρμα.] Having the seeds naked.

Gynecocrasay
Gýnecocrasay. n.s. [γυναικοκρατία; gynecocratie, French.] Petticoat government; female power.

Gyration
Gyrátion. n.s. [gyro, Latin.] The act of turning any thing about.
This effluvium attenuateth and impelleth the neighbour air, which, returning home, in a gyration carrieth with it the obvious bodies into the electrick. Brown's Vulgar Errours.
If a burning coal be nimbly moved round in a circle with gyrations, continually repeated, the whole circle will appear like fire; the reason of which is, that the sensation of the coal in the several places of that circle remains impressed on the sensorium, until the coal return again to the same place. Newt.

Gyre
Gyre. n.s. [gyrus, Latin.] A circle described by any thing going in an orbit.
Ne thenceforth his approved skill to ward,Or strike, or hurlen round in warlike gyre,Remember'd he; ne car'd for his safe guard,But rudely rag'd. Fairy Queen, b. ii. cant. 5.
Does the wild haggard tow'r into the sky,And to the South by thy direction fly?Or eagle in her gyres the clouds embrace? Sandys.
He fashion'd those harmonious orbs, that rollIn restless gyres about the Artick pole. Sandys.
Quick and more quick he spins in giddy gyres,Then falls, and in much foam his soul expires. Dryden.

Gyve
To Gyve. v.a. [from the noun.] To fetter; to shackle; to enchain; to ensnare.
With as little a web as this, will I ensnare as great a fly as Cassio.  Ay, smile upon her, do. I will gyve thee in thine own courtship. Shakespeare's Othello.

Gyves
Gyves. n.s. [gevyn, Welsh.] Fetters; chains for the legs.
The villains march wide betwixt the legs, as if they had gyves on. Shakespeare's Henry IV. p. i.
And knowing this, should I yet stay,Like such as blow away their lives,And never will redeem a day,Enamour'd of their golden gyves? Ben. Johnson's Forest.
The poor prisoners, ready to take the occasion offered, boldly starting up, break off their chains and gyves. Knolles.
Do'st thou already single me? I thoughtGyves and the mill had tam'd thee. Milton's Agonistes.
But Telamon rush'd in, and hap'd to meetA rising root, that held his fasten'd feet;So down he fell, whom sprawling on the ground,His brother from the wooden gyves unbound. Dryd. Fables.
